「……As expected, it will be embarrassing, doing it in front of Otou-sama and Okaa-sama. But, if Hajime wishes for it.」



「I don’t wish that! There is a limit even at being abnormal!」



「Myy, Hajime you! This pervert son!」



「Kaa-san, shut up a bit there!」



Hajime’s retort gushed out. On this occasion, he left alone Yue who was blushing while fidgeting with both her hands on her cheeks. For the time being, he should make her wear some clothes and recover the order in the Nagumo household. Hajime was about to act with that objective.



But, before he could do that,



「I, I cannot let, only Yue take the spotlight! Ha, Hajime-kun!」



「Ka, Kaori?」



Still in her naked apron, Kaori, who peeked out from the cover of the kitchen, leaped out as though she had been waiting for her turn. While she was fidgeting pigeon-toed looking embarrassed, she yelled with an expression that was filled with resolve.



「Won’t you eat me as dinner!?」



「What are you saying!?」



「What seasoning do you wanttt!?」



「Calm down-, what you are saying is just too lacking in common sense!」



「Myy, Hajime you! This Mr. gourmet master-」



「I’m going to throw you out of the house, Kaa-san!」



After that, Shia and the others similarly leapt out after that and were saying similar things which Hajime retorted back at severely. Sumire, who watched that, stirred up the place. Shuu, who recovered his consciousness with a ‘hah’, was made to sleep with a swift unavoidable attack, and in the end, it was one hour later before they could have dinner normally.



By the way, as expected everyone was wearing clothes when eating dinner. For some reason, everyone was wearing risqué cosplay appearances though……



In the middle of dinner, a young delivery service man was making a delivery, but he was startled by the blonde miniskirt police woman that came out from the house. He stepped back after seeing the miniskirt nurse that came out from behind the police woman saying「You forget the stamp heree」. Next, he sweated coldly due to the miniskirt shrine maiden that came in a panic saying「What are you two doing going out with that appearance!」. In the end, the young man expressed his gratitude「Tank ou hery much-―――」that was filled with various meanings with a red face and also panic.



At any rate, the cooking showdown had everyone make one dish; which then got judged by Hajime, and it went mostly peacefully.



「Haa」



「Nmyu? What’s the matter papa?」



In the bath, Hajime was washing the hair of Myuu who came home just before the dinner while unintentionally making a tired sigh. Myuu was tilting her head that was covered all over with bubbles.



「Myuu……grow up into a normal girl for me okay.」



「??」



「No, it doesn’t matter. Just forget it.」



Looking at his beloved daughter that was tilting her head in incomprehension, Hajime was smiling wryly thinking ‘just what am I saying’ before rinsing off the bubbles on Myuu’s hair.



But, at that time, Hajime’s senses detected the presence of several people approaching the bathroom!



「Wait, Kaori and also Shizuku, those two haven’t gone home yet?」



Before Hajime entered the bath, he had told the two of them that they should go back home soon. But regardless of that, Hajime could sense the presence of Kaori and Shizuku among the presences that were approaching; it made Hajime be at his wits’ end. Immediately after, the door of the bathroom was opened loudly. Just as he expected, there were the stark naked figures of Yue and the others boldly standing imperiously! Not even a single string was covering their bodies; it was to the degree that Hajime wanted to tell them to at least use a towel to cover their front. (For the moment, it was only Shizuku who was using a towel to hide her body.)



「……Nn. Now-」



「Charge desuu!」



「I won’t lose! The one who is the most skilled at washing Hajime-kun’s body is meee!」



「Ufufu, today is the day I’m washing the front.」



「Haa haa, Goshujin-sama, haa haa」



「……Pardon me.」



It appeared this was a competition about who could wash the body of the husband the best. Hajime’s eyes were twitching while he quickly headed to the bathtub and urged Myuu to follow. It was as though he was asking her if she could accompany him.



But,



「I won’t let you!」



Along with those words, *whoosh* Yue instantly appeared before Hajime’s eyes.



「Wai-, don’t use “Heaven Existence” in this kind of place!」



「Level X–」



「Maximum body reinforcement!? Ah, idiot, let go, this pervert rabbit!」



「Even me-, Limit Break-」



「What kind of limit are you planning to break, huh!?」



Hajime was completely surrounded by the vampire princess, the bug rabbit, and the angel mode maiden! Using that opening, Remia secured Myuu while Tio used wind magic to form a barrier and shut out the voices from leaking outside by laying out a veil of air.



Like that, in the next moment, the bathroom was turned into a battlefield. A battlefield of carnivorous maidens.



「Kuh, who can stay in this kind of place where there are only beasts! I’m going back to my room!」



While holding up a strange flag, Hajime slapped Tio severely to the point that it made her pant while he attempted to rush out of the bathroom. There Yue teleported, and Kaori activated her God Speed and leapt at his back while Shia clung on to his waist with her greatest body reinforcement. Because of his wet feet and the polished floor, Hajime slipped and fell down.



There Yue and the others jumped further at that chance; even the revived Tio also got on top of Hajime.



At the corridor of the Nagumo household, there was the figure of Hajime who was lying upside down while being covered with beautiful women and girls.



At the same time,



There was the figure of Sumire, cackling loudly while rolling on the corridor holding her stomach from seeing that situation.



Somewhere, *snap* the sound of something snapping resounded.



Right after that, Yue and the others raised「Aahn」coquettish voice. Their weak spot was fondled by Hajime. Strength reflexively left their bodies~, using that opening Hajime stood up. Kaori was saying something foolish「Hau, Hajime-kun’s Hajime-kun is in front of my eyes」, but he ignored that.



「Kaa-san, it seems that a family meeting is necessary between us. Also, it has to be an extraordinarily harsh meeting.」



「My, Hajime. I don’t think that such meeting is necessary though?」



「No, it’s necessary. ……The meeting for the sake of making Kaa-san reflect on yourself!」



Hajime’s store of patience had run out from his mother’s prank that was too much. He took a step forward. He intended to wrap his mother in a bamboo mat then hang her up for a night so she could reflect a little.



But, it seemed that Sumire had already predicted that action of Hajime’s. While saying「I’ve thought that this will happen!」with a triumphant look, she took out a vacuum cleaner that was leaning in the shadow of the corridor.



――Cleaning Artifact “Sniper Mark II”



By any chance, do you have the experience of sucking even the thing that must not be sucked carelessly when cleaning using a vacuum cleaner? It can become a cause that broke the vacuum, but opening the lid to fish it out every single time is troublesome, isn’t it? In that kind of time, use this. The next generation vacuum cleaner “Sniper Mark II”.



If you have this, you can select the target that you want to suck and the target that you don’t want to suck! Furthermore! If you put this to practical use, it’s even possible to suck the soy sauce or the remote control that is far away into your hand, just with a single push of a button! The next generation vacuum cleaner is already not limited for just cleaning in its utility!



The absorption force will never fall. The era from here on is the era of multiple absorption forces that suck only the prey you aimed for!



The vacuum cleaner (exclusive for the Nagumo household) that Hajime developed with such a catchphrase was held in Sumire’s hand.



In front of the suspicious eyes of Hajime, Sumire took out the degraded version Crystal Key from her breast pocket. It was handed over to her so in the case that something happened to his parents because of the matter of Hajime and the others, they could immediately teleport away.



Before Hajime could say「What are you」, Sumire stabbed the degraded crystal key to the front. Immediately the space distorted, and a gate materialized. At the same time, Sumire pushed the max mode button on the vacuum cleaner. Naturally, the powerful absorption force pulled on the target from inside the gate.



「Wha, wha, what!? What is going on!? Nooo――, I’m being pulleeeeeeed-」



Like that, a familiar scream could be heard, then from the other side of the gate, a petite female figure in a suit tumbled out. Sumire turned off the switch at the same time when that figure came out, but following the law of inertia, the female that leaped out from the gate rolled into the corridor of the Nagumo house, the figure finally stopped when her face crashed *munyu!* on the obstacle in front of her.



「……」



「……」



The female that rolled out from the gate and plunged into a certain thing with her face――Hatayama Aiko-sensei, wordlessly, slowly, pulled her face away from that place where her face was buried into. And then, looking at that thing dangling in front of her eyes that seemed to be familiar, she tilted her head while saying……



「Hajime-kun?」



「Aiko, can you spare me from you calling my name while looking at my crotch?」



「Hah!? Awawawawawa, I, I’m sorry~」



Yes, the rolling out Aiko, due to the momentum, her face landed on the son of Hajime that was currently standing imposingly stark naked.



Aiko instantly blushed hard while her mind was in chaos thinking ‘I don’t understand the situation!’. Looking from her suited figure, perhaps she had work regardless of the holiday and she only just came home. Despite so, she was suddenly made to teleport, and on top of that she dived face first into the crotch of her lover that was hidden from society except to some people……it was only natural for her to be astonished.



「Yo, you are wanting me and are using this kind of forceful method!?」, or「No, it’s not like I hate it but……waiting naked like this is a bit……」, or「Pe, perhaps I cannot go home tonight……」, it also couldn’t be helped if she was talking to herself like that, perhaps.



Anyway, after Hajime wrapped a towel on his waist, he ran his gaze around once more, but Sumire’s figure had already disappeared; he could only see the door of the entrance that was closing and a piece of paper fluttering midair. It seemed her plan was to make Aiko a distraction while she escaped. It was a splendid escape.



Hajime picked up the memo paper that fell at his feet, and his gaze fell on it. There,



『I received enough material. Thank you, very much. Mama is going back to her work now!』



Such a thing was written.



「Haa, I thought it was something like this……Yue, you noticed it already, right?」



Hajime was sighing to his mother’s deed while questioning Yue who was standing at his side unnoticed. In response, Yue nodded. Hearing that, Shia who had similarly recovered tilted her head and asked what Hajime meant.



「Look here, whether the wedding ceremony will be done one by one, or with everyone all at once, either is fine, but there is no rule that only one person can do it. Besides, if need be, we can also just do the ceremony at Tortus.」



「Aa~, now that Hajime-san mentions it that’s true isn’t it.」



「Besides, even the marriage registration, I have already faked the official papers about you all itself, so fussing about the marriage registration for everyone right now is meaningless, isn’t it? Something like the consistency of the data or whatever, it can be taken care of later as we please.」



「Now that you mention it, that’s true. Then, why did Okaa-san do something like a Bride deciding battle……」



「That’s obviously for her material collection. Just why do you think she was slacking off in the house this afternoon?」



In short, Sumire said whatever sounded appropriate to incite Shia and the others, and then the uproar that was caused due to that would be turned into the material for her manga that currently was reaching the limits. That was Sumire’s scheme.



Shia and the others thought that it was also their own fault that they got caught into the provocation thoroughly like that, but Sumire’s capability of letting out a flowing speech just by adlibbing like an agitator, it was just as expected from the mother of Hajime.



And then, Yue who noticed the intention of such Sumire still participated without really objecting was because,



「Today too was a fun day.」



「I see.」



That seemed to be the reason. For Yue, this kind of stupid uproar was also included in her lovely ordinary days. Something like boorish fair arguments could be tossed into the trash can. The satisfied expression of Yue made Hajime shrug「Well, then, it’s fine」.



「Say~, I really don’t understand what you are all taking about though……」



Aiko called timidly at Hajime and the others that were feeling warm and fluffy by themselves. Hajime glanced at Aiko and,



「My body got completely cold now……let’s enter the bath again. With everyone this time.」



Saying that Hajime picked up Aiko in a princess carry. 「Eh? Eh?」Giving a glance at Aiko who was in confusion, Yue and the others raised an「Oo~」in harmony and returned to the large bathroom of the reconstructed Nagumo house.



After that, including Aiko who was stripped by Hajime’s hand, Hajime and the wives relaxed and enjoyed the bath without particularly any competition.



……There was no one who paid any attention to Shuu who was still passed out in the living room.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.





Chapter 194




A famous foreign manufactured car (Mercedes Benz) that was reputed to be the firmest in the world was gallantly driving on the road along the coast. The car’s exterior, which was shining silver, showed how well polished it was, making anyone who saw it understand how much the owner cherished it.



Inside that car, the sea breeze flowed in from the opened window and the classic song, which was the favorite of the car owner, was playing making the time of the people riding that car to pass in relaxation.



「This sea route still feels pleasant every time we come here.」



Yes, the refreshing voice that expressed the feeling of this drive, was the driver of this car and also its owner――Shirasaki Tomoichi. He had hair that was lightly flowing down his back, long slitted and gentle eyes, and a balanced body type while his age was only that of being in the middle of his forties; just from his appearance, he was a handsome man that could pass as a man that was still in his late twenties.



Sitting beside Tomoichi was a woman that nodded at Tomoichi’s words while saying「You’re right, no matter how many times we come here, this is a really good place.」, was Shirasaki Kaoruko. Looking at her straight black hair without any white hair, her droopy eyes, and the neat and clean atmosphere she was clad with, she was a woman that felt like a lady. She was the same as Tomoichi as her age was in the middle of her forties, but she still looked like a young woman in her late twenties.



Just like their family name showed, they were a married couple. Just from their atmosphere, it could be clearly seen how they had been building a satisfactory marital relationship.



But even while Tomoichi’s consciousness was concentrating on the driving, it didn’t seem like he was paying attention at his wife. Since before, he kept glancing at the rearview mirror and repeatedly paid attention to the rear seat. Even his impression of the drive just now seemed to be a bit forced if someone listened carefully, rather than saying that it was his true feeling it was more a lure for starting a conversation. And then, it was clear that the cause of that was the passenger in the rear seat.



Hearing no other response to his words other than from his wife, Tomoichi coughed「A, ahem」, this cough also seemed to be forced, and then he once again formed his words to try to attract the attention of the person in the rear seat. This happened while his wife beside him was giggling at him.



「O, Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan, their ages are already quite old, so how about we move here soon? A home near the sea is nice don’t you think? Hey, what do you think? Kaori?」



「……Absolutely, no.」



The cold voice and words that came back caused Tomoichi to let out a small groan「Uguu」. He once more began repeatedly glancing at the rearview mirror to look at his beloved daughter――Kaori’s expression who was sitting in the back.



Kaori was emitting an assertion「I am displeased desu!」from her whole body while staring fixedly on the outside as though to say that she absolutely wouldn’t meet Tomoichi’s eyes. But even with such a super displeased mode being turned on, her posture, without putting her elbow on the window or crossing her arms, of having her two hands were put on her lap with her back straight, was really Kaori like.



Tomoichi attempted to talk further with an expression that looked a little desperate at Kaori.



「I, is that so? In the past, each time we came to play here, wouldn’t you always say ‘I don’t want to go home!’. Remember Riko-chan who lived next door, or your cousin Sakura-chan, you always played together with them, right? I think moving here is not really ba――」



「Then, isn’t it fine if Otou-san moves here alone?」



「!? No way!? That’s too much you know, Kaoriii!」



With a snap, Tomoichi turned around to the back seat. The Benz of the Shirasaki family was zigzagging! A string slap landed on Tomoichi’s face! Tomoichi’s face was forcefully faced to the front!



A call「Dear?」from Kaoruko that made Tomoichi fell a small but intense chill resounded inside the car. 「Forgive me」Tomoichi honestly apologized. Tomoichi knew really well that the true anger of his wife was like a production machine of trauma. In his dream, the Shiro Yasha-san was making an appearance! (TN: Shiro Yasha=white demon)



「Geez, dear you really……there is no way Kaori will accept that suggestion, right? There is Shizuku-chan, and also her friends at school back there.」



「Pe, perhaps that’s true but……」



Tomoichi’s eyes were swimming while he was still feeling the stinging pain on his cheek. Seeming very reluctant, he whispered「Even so, I think that idea is not bad though……」



Currently, the Shirasaki family was heading to the home of Tomoichi’s parents where both his parents and his older brother and his wife were living. Tomoichi’s elder brother and his wife had a daughter that was four years older than Kaori. That daughter was a really helpful daughter even though she could be a bit frank; she was an existence that was like a big sister to Kaori. The house was near the sea, so the two of them often played at sea together with Riko of the Ayasaki family who lived next door.



Kaori was an only child, and because of that she really idolized Sakura. When Kaori was little she often clung to Sakura while throwing tantrums and yelling「I don’t want to go home yet」. Due to that, Tomoichi was thinking, could Kaori possibly consider moving there even now……could she be distanced from that nasty shitty brat……and so on, but…….



Kaoruko, who seemed to grasp those thoughts dwelling inside of Tomoichi’s heart clearly, was giggling while speaking about the thing that Tomoichi didn’t want to hear the most. About the real reason why Kaori was displeased. About the young man that was the reason that Kaori absolutely wouldn’t accept moving from home.



「Besides, you see? There is no way that Kaori will leave the town where Hajime-kun is, don’t you think?」



「Stop it Kaoruko! This is our long-awaited family’s homecoming without any outsiders, you know!? Don’t say anything about that shitty brat who dares to make a pass at the cute angel of our family――」



「Otou-san?」



Tomoichi felt a chill at his back and twitched. He understood even without looking. This was a presence that really resembled his wife’s! It would be there if he looked back! The incarnation of fury that his daughter inherited from her mother before he noticed――the Hannya-san!



But, just with this much, Otou-san wouldn’t lose. For the sake of his beloved daughter, the apple of his eye!



「Ka, Kaori, calm down. My words just now were a bit poor. But, as expected Otou-san, about that bagwor――ahem-. That tras――ehem-. That shitty――」



「……I’m going home right now. I won’t listen anymore to what Otou-san has to say.」



「Nooo! Kaori, listen to what I’m saying! Otou-san is thinking about what is best for Kaori’s sake……」(TN: Here Tomoichi is saying nooo in English.)



「Otou-san is badmouthing Hajime-kun because Otou-san is thinking about what’s best for me? I never thought that Otou-san is that kind of person.」



「You are wrong, Kaori! Even Otou-san doesn’t want to say bad things about, Ha, Haji, Haji――about that guy. But, but still? While that bastard already has Kaori, he still made many other girls to serve him and open their legs for him; on top of that, instead of feeling guilty, he is acting defiant, you know? Do you think there is any father that can entrust his daughter to that kind of shitty bastard? No, such a father doesn’t exist! I’m telling this for your own good. Kaori, cut your relation with that cocky rubbish scum――」



「I hate someone like Otou-san so much!」



「Gahah!?」



Tomoichi, who was hit by the speech that would empty the HP of any father in the whole country if it was said to them by their daughter, caused the car to zigzag once more. With tears gathering at the corner of his eye, Tomoichi was leaking out the voice「No waaay, Kaorii, My Angeeeel~」looking really pathetic. (TN: The ‘my angel’ here is said in English.)



A few months after Kaori returned home from the other world, Tortus. Tomoichi and Kaoruko were already introduced to Hajime. From the beginning, before the summoning, Tomoichi and Kaoruko already knew that Kaori had a boy in her mind, but putting aside Kaoruko, from the start Tomoichi was already unable to stomach that boy――Hajime.



It wasn’t like Tomoichi had a clear reason. It was the feeling of a father whose treasured daughter might be taken from him, that feeling might even be called as a conditioned reflex. Tomoichi sometimes even bared his hostility toward Kouki and Ryutaro. If he acted like that even to the childhood friends of his daughter, then Hajime, who had started to live inside his daughter’s heart before he noticed, was already like his sworn enemy, that really couldn’t be helped.



Naturally, because this was Tomoichi, whose level as a doting parent had already reached the max value when Kaori disappeared, it was already a disaster for him. At that time, Kaoruko’s physical condition also worsened, but the Shirasaki family somehow held on by borrowing the help of the elder brother’s family and their parents, and also their whole relatives.



And then, his beloved daughter returned home like a miracle. They were told about the truth of the disappearance which scared them out of their wits from various things, and then they were shown many mystics in order to prove Kaori’s story, naturally all of those were a succession of astonishment for them but……there was a matter that was really hard to forgive, to the degree that all those absurdities seemed like trivial matter.



Yes, it was the matter about how his beloved daughter(My Angel) had made a lover.



Furthermore, that lover had several other lovers other than Kaori, he didn’t even have any intention to separate from any of those lovers, and in the end, he started talking about taking them all as wives. ‘Are you making a fool of me-, you bastard!’ Tomoichi roared angrily like that many times……



On top of that, the daughter in question was accepting of such a harem situation and making a really happy expression that even Tomoichi had never seen before. She was also saying things like ‘together with the other girls!’, and upon hearing that several times Tomoichi yelled angrily ‘You bastaaard, you are putting my daughter under some strange magic, aren’t you! No, it absolutely must be like that, you harmful pest-!’……



Furthermore, the speech that all the fathers in the whole country feared that someday might be said to them, no, the speech that the fathers had resolved they wouldn’t let any man say! ――「Father-in-law, please give your daughter to me!」, instead became「Father-in-law, I’ve received your daughter. Please take care of me from here on too」. When that curve ball was thrown to Tomoichi, he very naturally thought this, 「Yosh, let’s kill this guy」.



Everything was for the sake of his beloved daughter, to protect her from a bad man. Yet despite so, when he was about to punch the bastard, the one who pinioned him from the back was the daughter herself. While Hajime, who was about to be punched, kept sitting calmly and composedly. That self-assured attitude (Hajime himself was aware that he had something that was considered the worst, so he was only waiting to be punched) was also something he couldn’t stomach! Tomoichi was raging「This shitty bastarddd-, I’ll beat you to deathhhhh!」like that, but in the end was stopped by Kaori「Otou-san, calm dooooown!」with a suplex. Because Tomoichi lost consciousness, the meeting at that time was dissolved just but……



After that, Tomoichi knew that actually, Kaori had already climbed the stair of adulthood, which caused Tomoichi’s killing intent to climb without knowing a place to stop.



This time too, actually Kaori wanted to participate in the Nagumo family’s little gathering. But Tomoichi who thought ‘No way I’ll let my daughter go to the devil’s place’ hurriedly scheduled a visit to his parents and took Kaori along half forcefully.



When Kaori was in the middle of talking to Hajime about the arrangement, Tomoichi took away Kaori’s phone and said to the phone「Kaori has plans! She is going to spend her holiday with me! From here on too she won’t have any openings in her plans! Don’t call anymore, you scum bastard!」, and then he cut off the connection as he pleased.



Naturally, Kaori was getting angry at her father’s doing, but Tomoichi only looked aside with a huff and turned a deaf ear to Kaori. While that was happening, Hajime used telepathy to Kaori to tell her 「You should spend time with your family this time. Actually, I really understand how your father is feeling.」with a wry smile, and so Kaori reluctantly acquiesced to visit her grandparents.



Although, Kaori’s mood, who had her phone call taken over as it pleased on top of the fact that her lover had abusive language spouted at him, was at its lowest, so since they departed from their home, Tomoichi was desperate in currying favor to his daughter.



「Come on you two. Leave it at this; we are going to arrive soon, see?」



While smiling wryly at the cold war (one-sided) between father and daughter, Kaoruko intermediated between them. Just as she said before they realized it, they had entered a residential area, and in front of the car, a splendid house with two buildings that they were really familiar with began to become visible.



While being concerned about Kaori’s state, Tomoichi stopped the car at the shoulder of the road, in front of the house. In the middle, *garigari*, an ominous scraping sound that should not come from a high class car could be heard, but such a thing was only a trivial matter for Tomoichi who was hopelessly bothered over his daughter’s state. He left aside the expression of his wife that was looking like she had a headache.



Kaori immediately got out of the car without saying anything. Tomoichi also hurriedly got out of the car and took out the luggage from the car’s trunk.



「Kaori. Otou-san will carry the luggage for you!」



They planned to stay for three or four days, so Kaori’s luggage was in a Boston bag sized bag. Tomoichi carried the luggage while speaking smilingly, but Kaori walked briskly to him and tore off her luggage from him with a huff.



「It’s only until the entrance, Otou-san is too exaggerating. ……If it’s Hajime-kun, he will naturally bring the luggage without saying anything like that.」



「!? Is, is that so!? Ha, Haji……that bastard, earning a point in a petty way like that. (Hajime-kun, really is a considerate child isn’t he~)」



「……Haah. Dear, your true feelings and surface attitude are reversed there you know.」



Kaori averted her face ‘Puiihh!!’ from Tomoichi who was plainly leaking out his true feelings without hiding it at all, and then she ignored Tomoichi and walked away briskly. Tomoichi fell to his knees at the entrance of the house. His figure that was on all fours with his head hanging down was really inviting pity……



「……Just when I thought that you all finally arrived. Oji-san, what are you doing in that kind of place? The neighbors are looking, so I want you to stop doing that though.」(TN: Oji-san=uncle)



When Kaori was about to ring the chime of the door, a resident of the house, that seemed to come from the backyard while circling the house to the front, called with a voice that sounded exasperated and astonished.



「Sakura-oneechan!」



「Welcome Kaori. As always, it looks like it’s difficult for you involving various things, but I’m glad that you look energetic. Just relax slowly here.」



Kaori smiled widely at the owner of that voice――her cousin Shirasaki Sakura and embraced her.



Sakura, who was a female college student, had straight brown hair. She was a beautiful woman with a well proportion body like a model (TN: The words used here have the meaning beautiful, well-proportioned woman (body 8 times longer than the head)). The features of her face itself vaguely resembled Kaori, but the atmosphere she was clad in was basically cool. She felt like the so-called frank girl. Her hand was holding a hose that was trickling water, so surely she was just watering the garden before this.



Sakura’s cool gaze softened at her cousin that was like a little sister who leaped into her chest, and then she used her empty hand to caress Kaori’s head gently.



When she heard that Kaori was involved in a group disappearance, she was really worried to the point that she felt lost. Naturally, when she was notified that Kaori had come home, she immediately went to meet her directly. And so, different from the other distant relatives, she had already met with Kaori several times since Kaori’s return.



Even so, the society was still in commotion in regard to the topic of the returnees. The topic could be seen enough on the television, so as expected, it was something joyful to be able to see Kaori’s energetic face directly like this.



The sun had already gone down by this point. On the coastal street where the veil of night was beginning to fall, Kaori and Sakura were walking close to each other like true sisters.



「The live show was amazingly lively, wasn’t it? I don’t really go often to that kind of event, so I was really excited.」



「Is that so? Then that’s good. There were only local bands, so I wondered if it was strange for you.」



Kaori, who received a passionate welcoming at Sakura’s home, had passed a relaxing time there while talking to each other about their families’ recent state for a while. And then when it was evening, she was told that there was a live event of the local bands at the coastal venue starting at that time, so she was taken along by Sakura to attend at the live to kill time.



Sakura responded to her cheerfully smiling younger sister that she would be glad if Kaori was able to enjoy the show, however, Sakura’s expression was twitching a bit. The cause of that was one person. Sakura glanced over her shoulder behind them.



「Uu, Kaoriii. My angeeel. Can you make eye contact with Otou-san soon? Otou-san is going to die here from the loneliness.」



Yes, it was Tomoichi. For two women to go to a live show by themselves, they didn’t know what could happen to them. Giving that argument, Tomoichi went along with Kaori and Sakura, but the attitude of Kaori that treated him like he didn’t exist caused Tomoichi to make a contorted face that was about to cry. Furthermore, Kaori didn’t change her attitude at all even after looking at her father acting like that; instead, she was still smiling cheerfully, and looking at such a Kaori, honestly speaking, it was a bit scary.



The cold war between the father and daughter was definitely inflicting damage to Sakura’s stomach.



By the way, the reason Kaori was taking such an attitude wasn’t only because of the quarrel in the car, or Tomoichi’s accompaniment to the live show. Actually, when the families were talking at Sakura’s house, a topic about Hajime came up and urged by Sakura, Kaori made a call but……anyway what could be said was that Tomoichi bombed that phone call once more.



「……Hey, Kaori. How about you forgive Oji-san soon? Oji-san, he looks like he is seriously going to cry there. Honestly, having an uncle with a face that’s about to cry following behind you on the street at night, it’s scary.」



「Fufu, sheesh Sakura-oneechan. What are you saying? No matter where you look, there isn’t anyone like that here, you know?」



「Kaoriii! Otou-san is right here! Now, look here, please!」(TN: The ‘please’ is said in English.)



「See? There is no one, right?」



「Haa……」



Sakura’s stomach received further damage. For Sakura, if her cute little sister made a boyfriend, then she also wouldn’t be so accepting of that boyfriend. Therefore, it wasn’t like she couldn’t understand Tomoichi’s feeling. But, in reverse, to have a parent saying this and that about the person that she liked was……as a girl in the same position of being a daughter, she was also able to understand Kaori’s feelings. She was stuck between a rock and a hard place.



‘Geez, anything is fine, so won’t something happen that will end this father-daughter fight that has become quite troublesome’, when Sakura was running from reality by thinking that……



「Eehh? You girls there, you two were at the live show just now, right? What a coincidence! Want to talk a bit?」



It came. Inside her heart, Sakura held her head thinking「What kind of timing this is.」. Ahead of the gaze of Sakura, there was a group of youngsters with a really flashy atmosphere as though they were someone that really liked messing around. When judging from their similar appearances, there were about ten people. Sakura grandly made retorts, like why they were calling out to two girls when there were about ten people in their group, or whether they even saw the man who seemed to be the father behind the two of them. Of course, those were done inside her heart.



「My bad, but we have plans after this.」



「Plans? It’s plans to go play, right? Then, let’s go together yeah. The more, the merrier.」



Sakura politely refused, but the seducer group was grinning while surrounding Sakura and Kaori. No matter how they looked at this, it didn’t seem like they were planning to let the two of them go home merely. Because Sakura and Kaori were a beautiful woman and girl that really couldn’t be found that often in this area, these men wouldn’t give up that easily.



But, naturally, seeing his beloved daughter and cute nephew getting hit on, there was no way Tomoichi could just stay quiet.



「You all. My daughter just said that she doesn’t want to go with you. Now, open the way. We all just enjoyed a nice live show. Let both of our groups avoid any troublesome matter.」



「Aa, what is it, old man? Rather, your daughter? Eeh? By any chance, are you coming along with your daughter? Uwaa, that’s seriously disgusting.」



「Hey old man, being overprotective is no good. Is this what is called an over-demanding parent? Have some self-awareness. Seriously, how uncool.」



「Rather, the one harassing these two here is you old man. Seriously, realize that. Come on, you two too, let’s leave this stalker father and come play with us, yeah?」



The men who were trying to pick up the girls guffawed loudly from the words of Tomoichi who came to the front while verbally abusing Tomoichi. Hearing their words, Tomoichi didn’t even look particularly angry, far from that, he didn’t even show any fear being surrounded by more than ten people. He firmly said something more to stop the men from picking up girls more than anything but……



Perhaps feeling that Tomoichi, who was blocking their way, was irritating, one of the men passed beside Tomoichi and stretched his hand out toward Kaori.



「Can you not touch my daughter?」



「-, you really are noisy huh.」



Tomoichi suddenly gripped the man’s hand, his almond eyes quietly narrowed and he gave words of restraint. Tomoichi wasn’t particularly strong in a brawl. In his occupation, he was a first class architect, and there was no chance for his physical strength to be questioned in such an occupation. Even so, as an adult male who had piled up experience, furthermore, as a father who was witnessing someone trying to lay their hand on his daughter, the light of his eyes contained a considerable amount of pressure.



Therefore, the man was reflexively overpowered mentally. However, it seemed the man felt some shame from that fact, and his face immediately turned red indignantly. The man shook off the hand of Tomoichi that was grasping his hand, and at the same time, he hit Tomoichi.



Tomoichi let out a muffled voice, and something red oozed from the corner of his lips.



The man, driven by his indignation, swung his arm further, while the other men also stepped forward to further hurt Tomoichi who was a hindrance for them. Sakura was raising her voice to stop them while her fingers were gliding on her smartphone to contact the police, but it was at that moment,



「What are you all doing, I wonder? I wonder?」



Dread rushed through all the people in that place.



And then they noticed it. Before they even realized it, Kaori, who was already at Tomoichi’s side, had stopped the fist of the man that was swinging downward with one hand.



A chill that was impossible to understand lathered on their skin causing bumps and the strange situation of a girl smiling while stopping the serious punch of an older man with just one hand caused everyone to stiffen. In the middle of that, Kaori let out words with a flat tone that was the opposite of her smiling face.



「I’m asking you here, just what are you doing to my Otou-san, I wonder?」



「Wha, what the hell, are you!? Aa!? The father of you bitch was screwing around, so I was only giving him a lesson!」



The intimidating air that Kaori emitted caused the man whose fist was stopped to go into a frenzy while ranting. And then, the man’s other hand tried to strike in order to “give a lesson” to Kaori.



「Otou-san was screwing around? I guess so. Indeed, he is a troubling Otou-san who is always screwing around. He is overprotective, treating me like I’m still a small child. He immediately sulks if he is not paid attention to, and he keeps badmouthing Hajime-kun.」



「hrk, wha, what the hell-. This stupid strength-」



Kaori was talking with a small voice in a murmur, leaving the dumbfounded surrounding to lurch.



All the while gripping the two wrists of a man with a build far larger than herself.



From a glance, it was clear that the man was trying to pull his hands away with all his strength, but the hands holding him didn’t even twitch, as though he was being shackled with iron to a wall. Kaori’s words reached toward the man who was half falling into a panic.



「But you see, Otou-san is kind you know? He always thinks of me, no matter how busy he is with his work he always tries to make time to speak with me, he always protects me even though he is not strong in a brawl. When I worked hard, he praised me a lot, and when I made mistakes, he scolded me a lot.」



Kaori lifted her face. However, that gaze wasn’t directed at the man in front of her eyes. What she was looking at was Tomoichi at the side.



「……Otou-san, I’m sorry. I should have stopped it before you got hit. I recalled many things, so I was late to move. Thank you, for trying to protect me.」



「Kaori……」



Tomoichi only called Kaori’s name while looking at her wry smile. He could do nothing else but that. The reason was that his daughter’s figure was looking really grown-up for some reason. It was as though she was letting go of his hand; as if she had already left the nest since a long time ago. Even though they were in the middle of a situation like this, the loneliness that flooded his chest clogged up all his words.



Kaori moved his gaze from Tomoichi toward the men surrounding them, and then she let out her words along with an icy gaze.



「My father is the greatest father in the world. Don’t you dare, humans at the level of you all, make fun of him!」



「You bitch, let go of me alre――bugeh!?」



A kick that pointed to the sky was launched immediately after the angry yell. That kick impacted the jaw of the man whose both hands were gripped, and like that, that man was blown away like a joke in a parabolic arc.



The air returned to dead silence.



「If you all disappear right now, then I’ll overlook this.」



Kaori’s words resounded dignifiedly. A dainty girl was sending a young man with good physique flying with one kick――normally, the group of men would surely sense the abnormality of the situation; however, the difference in number between both sides and the common sense that said there was no way ten men could lose against a high school girl caused them to mistake their choice for the sake of their tiny pride.



The men were breathing roughly in agitation, their mouths hurled out unrestrained abusive language, and they adjusted their stance in preparation to attack.



「Yep, I guess it can only be like this. People like you all surprisingly all have the same pattern.」



Kaori lightly waved both her hands. Immediately, *kyakin!* a satisfying sound resounded, and two metallic poles appeared in both her hands. Those were extendable batons.



Kaori was wearing short sleeve clothes, which made anyone want to retort just where she hid those batons, but those who knew knew that it was great that what came out were only extendable batons, wasn’t it. Inside the ring that was attached with a crimson jewel dangling on Kaori’s neck, there were even brutal large swords that could easily split a great rock into two; those swords were exactly Kaori’s specialized weapon.



In the end, the two sword style using the extendable batons (Adamantium made-Lightning Clad enchantment) flashed on the coastal street at night; it became a fierce society study for the young men. Along with a trauma that wouldn’t disappear.



「Oji-san. It’s great, isn’t it? Kaori got angry like this for Oji-san’s sake. See, she is just like Oba-san. Please look at this goosebumps. It’s also like this when Oba-san is angry.」(TN: Oba-san=aunt)



「……Yo, you are right. Also, is, is it just my feeling? It feels like I can see “something” on Kaori’s back just like Kaoruko though.」



The last man ate a fierce blow at his butt that would make even a Thai kick look like mere child’s play; that man screamed「Aaa―――!!」while flying through the air. Sakura and Tomoichi were looking at that scene with a distant look and raised a dry laugh.



After that, Kaori tampered with the memory of the seducers with her own soul magic before she returned toward Tomoichi and Sakura with a really nice smile. It went without saying how Tomoichi and Sakura shivered altogether.



After that, seeing Kaori getting all fidgety looking like she wanted to talk with Tomoichi, Sakura read the mood and went back home first. Currently, Tomoichi and Kaori were walking silently with just the two of them on the path home.



「Otou-san, it doesn’t hurt anymore?」



「Yeah, it’s fine already Kaori. ……Magic is really amazing huh. You have shown it to me many times, so it feels too late saying this, but even now it still makes me feel admiration witnessing it.」



The wound on his lips had been healed by Kaori’s healing magic. Tomoichi said his thanks to Kaori with admiration just like he said. Feeling relieved hearing that, Kaori’s expression softened. And then, her gaze began wandering as though she was searching for words.



Seeing that state of his daughter, Tomoichi half-guessed just what she wanted to speak about and sighed inside his heart, then he urged Kaori to speak.



「Kaori, if there is something you want to say, then you can just say it as it is within your mind. After all, I’m the best father in the world. No matter what is it, I’ll listen to what you have to say.」



Kaori chuckled at the way her father spoke, and she opened her mouth.



「Say, I noticed this just now but……Hajime-kun, he resembles Otou-san doesn’t he-, that’s what I think.」



「……Can you pause there, Kaori? Even Otou-san has this thing called limit to what I can and cannot accept, you know? I’m similar to that harem man that is like a walking and talking haughty arrogance? I wonder, can Otou-san go out for a little bit of a journey? It’s okay; I think after finding myself for about a year, Otou-san will be able to stand up again.」



「Ahaha, that’s not what I meant. What I mean is not the current Hajime-kun, but the previous Hajime-kun.」



「The previous?」



Kaori nodded toward Tomoichi who showed a questioning face. And then, she narrowed her eyes in nostalgia and began to talk.



「Yes, previously. He couldn’t fight or anything at all, but when he thought that it was necessary, then he would step out without hesitation, that kind of weak but strong person. Yep, surely, that was why I became curious about Hajime-kun. Because, if I can be with a person that is similar with Otou-san, then I will be happy, I know that from looking at Kaa-san.」



「Kaori……. Right now, Otou-san’s feelings are really complicated. I’m happy but perhaps not happy……. However, that’s really hard to believe huh. That him, and the him of the past that Kaori talked about, I really cannot connect the two of them……」



「Isn’t that right. I too, when I reunited with Hajime-kun I was really shaken then. That was how much he changed. It was really terrible for him, to the degree that it was absolutely necessary for him to change. But, even so, deep inside he didn’t change. That’s why there are people that love Hajime-kun that much. A person who is merely insincere and like women, it would be strange if that kind of person is surrounded by that many people, isn’t it?」



「……Perhaps it’s just as you say. But, even so, as expected as a father it’s hard for me to consent. No matter who, if it is a father who has a daughter, then he will surely want to entrust his daughter to a person who will treasure her the most and only her.」



Tomoichi scratched his head looking troubled. Kaori took Tomoichi’s arm and then hugged him happily.



「Thank you, Otou-san. But, I have confidence. Indeed, it’s not just me alone that is with him, and I might not be the number one, even so, I’m confident that I can have happiness that won’t lose to anyone. Even though there are many people that are walking together with him, even so, I can puff up my chest and say I am cherished. Because, the person who had crawled up from the bottom of the abyss just with the thought that he wanted to go home to his important family, and defeated even god just because he wanted to take back his important person, such a person is the one who gave his promise to me, you know?」



Kaori showed Tomoichi the ring that was dangling from her neck. Different from the treasure warehouse, it was just a ring, but it was the eternal ring that was filled with the oath of her loved one.



After seeing that ring, Tomoichi’s expression turned extremely bitter.



「Otou-san. Hajime-kun, he is a person that will treasure every aspect of his important people, even the treasured people of that treasured people. That’s why he said that he wouldn’t give up no matter how much Otou-san hates him. He told me that he would treasure Otou-san and Okaa-san too.」



「……」



「That’s why, I understand that this is not normal, that this is something outlandish, but it’s fine even if it will take time. I want Otou-san to treasure Hajime-kun too. I want Otou-san to treasure my treasured person too.」



Kaori’s words rode the flowing night wind that carried the aroma of salt and vanished. Tomoichi’s expression was still bitter without any reply. If anyone looked at his eyes, they would be able to see a horrible discord whirling inside.



The long silence was continuing. Only the sounds of footsteps and sea waves were resounding in the ears of the two.



It was unknown how much time had passed, but before long Tomoichi deeply and grandly sighed. Toward Kaori who was staring at Tomoichi anxiously, his shoulders dropped while one of his hands held out to Kaori.



「Kaori. Can you contact that guy……Hajime-kun for me?」



「Otou-san……yes, wait a little bit.」



Kaori took her smartphone and called Hajime with a few rings. Hajime, who answered the phone, was told by Kaori that Tomoichi wanted to talk. Hajime consented readily without sounding particularly worked up. Hajime’s attitude that sounded composed caused Tomoichi’s face to turn bitter once more. Kaori handed over the smartphone while smiling wryly at that expression of his father.



「……It’s me.」



『It has been a long time.』(TN: Hajime used extremely polite language here.)



「Hmph! We just met around two months ago. Saying it has been a long time from that……it appears that within you, the matter of me is just like a mere stone at the roadside, huh.」



『No, that’s unthinkable. The family of Kaori is as important as a jewel for me.』



「Hmph! As always, it’s only your mouth that keeps spouting out pretty words, isn’t it? Is that how you trick my daughter?」



『Never. If pushed to say, then I think it is me who got caught.』



「Hmph!! Is this that? 『Not really, I am not really feeling anything here, but Kaori said that she wants this no matter what sooo, I’ll just give it a try』That’s what you think huh! Just what in the world are you――」



「Otou-san?」



「I’m sorry.」



When Tomoichi heard Hajime’s voice, his hostility flooded out like a conditioned reflex. At the same time, when he heard「Otou-san?」from his daughter, he also let out words of apology from a conditioned reflex. He wasn’t a mere father. He was a trained father.



While keenly feeling the gaze of Hannya-san from the side, Tomoichi cleared his throat while trickling cold sweat and opened his mouth once more.



「Ahem-. That, see, today, I called because……well, I too have various things in my mind. A father that has a daughter, no matter what, he cannot be gentle toward the man who is the partner of said daughter.」



『I understand. After all, I too have a daughter that makes me resolved to be a father. If I am in your position, and my daughter brings along a man like me, then there is no doubt that I will break all the bones in his body and bury him inside concrete, and in the end, I will throw him in the middle of Pacific Ocean.』



「Eh? Ah, yeah, tha, that’s it. I, I too, am thinking of doing at least that much, yup, to such a man, you know?」



『Yes. That’s why I understand how your blood must be seething. So much, that you must be thinking that you want to drop a nuclear bomb on me right now even if it drags the surroundings into it; that you want to dye everything in dark red, isn’t that right?』



「…………………Yo, you really got it huh!」



This time Tomoichi was trickling cold sweat from a different meaning. Hajime’s hostility was too extreme that far surpassed him. Furthermore, just by imagining the imaginary loved one of that daughter who might appear in the future, Japan might fall into a pinch in the future. Tomoichi was thinking, 「Ee? Isn’t the scale of hostility a bit too different from mine?」, which caused him to succumb to a complicated sense of defeat.



「Ahem-. It feels like I somehow came to understand really well how you are thinking, so let’s put this matter aside for a bit. More than that, I want to confirm something with you.」



『Yes.』



「You don’t have any intention to separate with Kaori. Conversely, you also don’t have any intention to separate from the other girls. You are planning to remain married with them all for life, and you don’t have the intention to bend that will. Isn’t that right?」



『It’s just as you say. I understand how such a thing is outlandish, how it goes against ethics, and how there are people like you who think unpleasantly of such a thing. But even knowing that, let me say it once more. Everyone, they all are my wives. That will of mine won’t bend. No matter what can possibly happen from here on, I won’t yield that will at all. My deepest apologies, but I will stick to this will for my whole life until you can possibly accept it.』



「tsk, you are brazenly acting defiant huh.」



『I will do everything in my power so that someday, you can possibly accept this as sincerity and determination of my own way.』(TN: The way Hajime used you to call Tomoichi here is also done in the politest way.)



Tomoichi’s hand that was holding the smartphone tightened. His fury was welling up hearing that nonsensical thing being spoken so brazenly. However, he saw the eyes of his daughter that was staring fixedly at him from the side, and then Tomoichi sighed once more to let out the heavy thing inside his chest.



「I really want to punch you flying right now, you know? The ideal future for me is that I won’t see your face anymore with my daughter, completely forgetting you once and for all.」



『I guess so. The troubling thing is, I understand your feelings painfully well. I also understand how it must be irritating for you that I am acting sympathetic like this. This is really a highly difficult problem, even more than adventuring in another world that was filled with death and absurdity.』



「I don’t know about the absurdity of another world, but there is not even a single doubt in me that this is the greatest trial that I have ever faced in my whole life. Aah, really, just why did my daughter encounter you in the past?」



『Surely, that’s because there is no one who can stand superior to this mean world.』



「No doubt about that. Good grief, this world really makes me go through something uncalled for. ……However, what is really, reall~y unfortunate is………………………………my daughter, is happy with this, with an expression so lovely that I have never seen before.」



『……』



Tomoichi stood still there. His parent’s house had come into view. But he couldn’t muster any will to enter the house like this. First, there was something that he had to ask, for the sake of the words and wish of his daughter that he had heard in this night, and above that, for the sake of producing a conclusion inside himself.



「Let me ask this to you, the shitty bastard who is trying to have your own way for a screwy future. Can you vow, that you will able to make, my daughter, my Kaori, to keep having that kind of expression forever? Can you vow, that she will be able to throw out her chest, and declare without hesitation that she is happy, can you make her continue to be that kind of girl forever?」



On the other side of the phone, Tomichi felt that the atmosphere suddenly changed. It was something that made Tomoichi feel Hajime’s serious feelings beyond any doubt before even hearing his next words……



『If it’s that vow, I have vowed it since a long time ago. This life is for that sake. It will never change, no matter what.』



「……」



Standing still in place, Tomoichi looked up to the sky. While feeling the gaze of his daughter that was looking up at him, he repressed the excessive urge to yell「BASTAAARDD――――!!」inside him. And then, breaking the silence, he formed the words while feeling a strange sense of defeat; he summoned up all his strength to the limit, in order to grant the earnest wish of his daughter.



「……Next time, come to my home. You can have dinner there.」



『……Thank you very much. I will surely visit to trouble your hospitality.』



An impact run through Tomoichi’s arm. When he looked there, Kaori was hugging Tomoichi’s arm with a full smile. With a small voice,「Otou-san, thank you. I love you!」she sent him the greatest words for a father. His feeling that almost made him scatter bloody vomit from working up the sentence just now, and also his murky feeling, all those feelings were somewhat cleared up if he could receive such words.



At the same time, when he thought that he received those words due to Haijme’s existence, as expected, he couldn’t help but feel a sense of defeat.



「Do, don’t you misunderstand! It’s not like I recognize you or anything! Until the end, I’m just thinking of keeping an eye on you for a bit, that’s all there is to it, don’t you dare make Kaori sad even for a bit! If you dare do that, then it will be that, that! It will be concrete and the Pacific Ocean and Nuclear I tell you!」



『Haha, that’s really terrifying. I will engrave those words deep in my heart.』



Tomoichi’s speech that was just like a tsundere caused Hajime and also Kaori to leak out chuckles reflexively.



It was at that timing when the talk almost end with a good feeling,



『Goshujin-samaaa~. Thy beloved servant has returned~. For the reward, please, chastise mine butt a lot toniiight!』



From the other side of the phone, some kind of voice that was filled with a mix of excitement and charm resounded. The moment that voice became audible, the atmosphere of Hajime changing into astonishment could be felt transmitted through the phone receiver.



『Tio, you, how did you come back!? Even though as the punishment of making merry in front of my Jii-chan and others before this I had wrapped you in a bamboo mat and tied you up to a missile before launching it……』(TN: Jii-chan=grandfather)



『Of course, it’s obviously by crawling back without untangling Goshujin-sama’s love(rope)! The kindness of not exploding the missile……if I didn’t answer that kindness, how could I be Goshujin-sama’s servant!』



『That’s a lie right……I sent you flying until the other side of the mountain; you shouldn’t be able to come back without crossing through the downtown……』



『Yes! When the people saw this crawling figure, that art like a caterpillar, cheers(screams) were raised everywhere. As expected even I felt shy. Furthermore, the authorities came out, so I traveled with a higher speed; everyone was already loudly cheering(pandemonium) then.』



『You are making a new urban legend in the city where my Jii-chan is living……』



『Now, grant the prize to me who hath worked hard in coming back. Specifically, a reward using that black, hard, and large thing, to chastise mine butt! Recently, Goshujin-sama didn’t do it much, so it feels lonely!』



『You stupid idiot! What kind of thing are you running your mouth about with that loud voice!』



Of course, the perverted exchanges that were done with loud voice were properly transmitted through the phone, to the father and daughter with cleared feelings.



「……Oi, perverted bastard.」



『! ……This is a misunderstanding desu. Give me a chance for explaining――』



「You think I’ll give you a chance? You think I’ll let you? Fufu, isn’t it strange? Aa, you are really, a strange man. Fufufufu.」



An eerie chuckle came out from Tomoichi. At his side, Kaori was holding her head while murmuring「Tio you idiooot」. And then, she tried to cover for Hajime and tried to talk to Tomoichi, but before she could do that, Tomoichi exploded.



「I take back my words-. You shitty bastaaaaarrrdd-! I absolute won’t hand over my daughter to a perverted bastard like you! I prohibit you from approaching her until the end of the world-! Someone like you, just explode with a nuclear bomb in the Pacific Oceaaaannnnnnnnnn――――!!!」



『Wai-, ple-――』



Hajime tried to make an excuse, but before he could do that, Tomoichi swung up his hand holding the smartphone, and then he threw the phone to the ground. A grievous scream「My smartphone――――!!」could be heard from the side, but such a voice didn’t reach Tomoichi who had transformed into a warrior that was a father protecting his daughter.



Far from that, as though the smartphone was a nemesis that couldn’t be allowed to live under the same sky, or possibly so that the hateful scum wouldn’t be able to call from the other side of the phone anymore, he stepped on the smartphone and grinded it many times.



Naturally, Kaori’s smartphone was invited into heaven.



「O, Otou-san! What are you doing!?」



「I am severing ties with that maggot-, with all my strength here! Kaori, don’t meet with that perverted bastard, until the end of the world! This is a promise with Otou-san!」



Indeed, if there was a father who would still entrust the daughter after hearing that kind of dialogue from the other side of the phone, then it would be better not to waste time to take such a father to a hospital. To a hospital for the brain.



However, from the point of view of Kaori, who had thoroughly witnessed Hajime’s unique relationship with Tio in the other world, she had already accepted it as an ordinary happening. Although she could understand her father’s feelings perfectly, witnessing her smartphone trampled and heard the person she loved being called a maggot caused her to want to object against her better judgment……



Tomoichi sensed his daughter’s atmosphere that obviously didn’t seem to obey him even after hearing that kind of exchange on the phone, and on top of that, even after he told her that she must not meet that man anymore. Tomoichi was trembling all over while declaring with all his strength in the residential area at night.



「Otou-san! Is abso~~~~~-lutely! Not appro―――――――ving-!!!」



「Ah, wait, Otou-san! Where are you going――――!!」



Tomoichi suddenly started to run. ……To the direction that was the opposite of the house. And then, in the blink of an eye, he disappeared toward the residential area.



If he went back to the house, then he would be talked to by his daughter about that hateful shitty bastard again. That was why he wouldn’t go home anymore. Until Kaori understood, Otou-san will run away from home! It was such a thing.



The shoulders of Kaori, who somehow guessed her father’s intention, slumped down.



「Normally, the one who runs away from home because they are not being understood should be the daughter, isn’t it?」



After whispering that, Kaori then chased after Tomoichi.



The father who absolutely didn’t want to approve the person that his daughter loved, and the daughter who wanted her father to approve no matter what; both of them began to race at night.



After that, whether Hajime could be accepted or not by Tomoichi……



Anyway, let’s just say that Hajime worked even harder than even god slaying for that.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Everyone, do you know about [Aozora no Kishi] series on Ni○ Dou? (TN: This refer to Nico Douga)



I found it recently, and it was totally enthralling.



Watching that, my hand reached out to Ace Combat again (it makes me have misgivings about the update next week……)



I want to try writing a light novel with an idiot and cool fellows like that as the characters someday.



Uploader-sama, thank you for making my holiday lovely.





Chapter 195




It was just before the sun approached the zenith of its climb. Hajime was walking expressionlessly through the residential area on a certain riverside.



It wasn’t like he was in a bad mood, but when he thought about the location he would be visiting after this, it made him feel somewhat melancholic. On top of all that, it also caused him to rack his brain about this and that when it came to how to deal with it, so his expression was naturally stiff.



Although, no matter how much Hajime worried about it since he had no intention of yielding the status quo or his will, resolving this was extremely difficult and finding a solution that could work in one go was next to impossible. Compared to this difficult problem, conquering a great labyrinth was something really simple.



「Well, that’s obvious, it can’t be helped, huh?」



He let out a small sigh while staring at his destination that came into view on the path ahead.



It was a spacious ground that was surrounded by splendid hedges with a large Japanese house inside of it, or rather than a house it was an estate. History could be felt from its appearance alone.



With a glance at that hedge and estate, Hajime finally arrived in front of the entrance. The front gate was also a heavy and splendid structure. The wood and iron were clearly conveying the months and years they had been piling up until now. If an ordinary person visited this place for the first time, they would unconsciously straighten themselves up.



The family name written beside the front gate was――”Yaegashi”.



Yes, this place was Shizuku’s house, and adjacent to the house was the long-established dojo of the Yaegashi-style.



For some reason Hajime looked at the nameplate where the name “Yaegashi” was carved while pushing on the button of the interphone installed beside the gate; the only piece that approached the modern age here.



『Yes, who could this be?』



A female voice immediately responded. It sounded young, with a pleasant tone that sounded calm, a voice that gave the feeling of maturity. The owner of that voice――if his memory from when he met her the last time was correct, then it was the voice of Shizuku’s mother, Kirino. She was the one who responded to Hajime.



「I received the invitation. This is Nagumo Hajime.」



『You are right on time, Hajime-san. Welcome. The gate is not locked, so please come inside as you are.』



「Excuse me for disturbing.」



Hajime put his hand on the gate. And then he pushed it open while sighing once more at “that” which he felt when he was walking the path that was facing the hedge.



Immediately after that, *hyu-* a sound of cutting wind!



「As expected huh……」



He carelessly lifted his hand in front of his forehead. Between the gaps of his fingers were several spheres held in place. Those things flew the instant Hajime opened the gate which he caught between his fingers. When he put a little strength into his fingers, those balls split with a cracking sound, and from inside them, colorful powder came out.



When he brought his nose near, the aroma of multiple spices like pepper or cayenne pierced his nasal cavity severely. If the spheres hit the forehead and their content scattered out, then a normal person would shed tears grandly while writhing in an unstoppable sneezing attack.



「I want to make a retort about just what kind of period this is but……really this house. Besides, if I am told this is reaping what I sow then that…..can’t be helped.」



Hajime strode across the threshold of the Yaegashi residence while smiling wryly.



First, the scenery of a considerably wide garden, which extended all the way to the entrance of the main building, entered his eyes. It wasn’t something like a Japanese-style garden where one could enjoy the sight, but a garden with normal weeds and gravel spread evenly throughout that looked well maintained. The path from the front gate to the main building’s entranceway was shown by stone paving; there was also a small pond distanced in between. Next, there were also garden lanterns hung irregularly and relatively big trees growing.



There was another independent one-story house a slight distance away, that place had become the dojo of the Yaegashi-style. But, on this holiday normally there should be the zealous voices of a lot of disciples practicing coming from there, instead, eerily there was no sound.



Hajime, who spontaneously wanted to sigh after guessing the reason of that silence, advanced on the stone paving, approaching a spot where a tree nearby with dense leaves had one of its branches extending out until it reached above the stone paving. It was at that time,



A killing intent was suddenly-!!



When Hajime looked up, there was a figure of an old man jumping down from the branch above his head, the hakama of the old man was fluttering while his hands were holding a wooden sword aloft! The sword ki the old man was clad with wasn’t something normal, a determination of sure defeat with one hit was residing in his eyes! That figure which swooped down from the sky, swinging down a mighty attack, was just like the technique of a certain wandering swordsman!



But, toward that sudden attack,



「It has been a long time, Shuuzou-san.」



Hajime, who stopped still with one hand the attack which looked like it could pulverize at least a boulder, lowered his head normally and gave a greeting. The opponent in front of his eyes that looked like he was around 80 with a deeply wrinkled face and white hair, was an instructor of the Yaegashi-style and the grandfather of Shizuku, so Hajime must show manners to him.



「Yes, long time no see, Hajime-kun. Nice of you to come. You can relax here.」



「Thank you very much.」



Shuuzou was speaking words of welcome normally as though nothing special happened while looking completely expressionless with his hands pushing down the wooden sword to the very limit. In response to that, Hajime too also returned the greeting familiarly.



Hajime and Shuuzou stared at each other wordlessly for a while, but as expected Shuuzou then quietly pulled back his wooden sword as though nothing happened and he turned on his heels.



「I think Shizuku is in her room. But, it’s a little unacceptable for you two who are still students to seclude yourself inside the same room. There are also delicious tea cakes, so come to the living room.」



「Aa~, yes, thank you-」



Shuuzou turned his back on Hajime and returned toward the dojo while talking. But, in the middle of that conversation, in an awkward timing, a new killing intent attacked Hajime!



Hajime quickly crouched, and over his head, a sharp, violent gale blew past. Furthermore, a cuff of a hakama was reflected at the edge of the sight of the crouching Hajime. A low kick aiming for Hajime’s head was rapidly approaching.



While evading that by leaping aside, Hajime used one of his hands in a handstand posture to roll before landing. Ahead of his gaze, there was the figure of the attacker still in continued alertness.



「Yaa, Hajime-kun. Nice of you to come. You can relax here.」



「……Thank you, Koichi-san. Excuse me for my intrusion.」



Yaegashi Koichi. He was the father of Shizuku and an instructor of the Yaegashi-style. He was a handsome middle-aged man with a rather harsh look, which was due to the gash in his cheek that he got from somewhere that was his trademark. While saying a speech that was the same with his father Shuuzou, and also with the same expressionless look as expected, he put his wooden sword on his waist as though nothing happened.



At that moment, a wooden sword was thrown at great speed from the side! Hajime, who quickly turned his head and evaded it clearly, heard a clicking tongue echoing from behind the nearby lantern basket.



Even furthermore, from behind the evading Hajime, a *zapaa-* sound resounded. The moment he heard that one of the pupils who seemed to be lurking inside the pond threw countless iron rods the size of a palm from a pose that looked like a wild falcon!



Hajime evaded that with a flowing feet movement like a fish swimming in the air, but right after that, he noticed something and back flipped highly from that place. When he did that, in the next moment, a young pupil smeared with soil leapt out from under the ground in the garden holding a wooden sword. The pupil was whispering「Chiih, so I failed in bringing him down-」with a small voice.



Hajime, who landed while smiling faintly to those words, quickly lifted his hand and grasped something that flew toward him. An arrow was caught by that hand. When he followed the trajectory, above the roof of the main building was a figure of someone that seemed to be a pupil holding a bow.



「I’m thinking this every time but……Yaegashi-style is absolutely not a kenjutsu dojo, right? Rather I think this place is a ninjutsu dojo instead.」(TN: Kenjutsu=sword art, ninjutsu=ninja art)



「What are you saying, Hajime-kun. Something like shinobi cannot possibly exist. Are you reading too much manga? It’s troubling that someone trying to become Shizuku’s partner is doing something like that.」



Hajime whispered his conjecture while staring fixedly at the pupils who were returning to the dojo quickly while likewise also acting as though nothing happened. Hearing that, Shuuzou said something like that with a tone that sounded really stumped.



The soaking wet pupil, who was lurking in the pond, quickly took off his dougi uniform and underneath it, there were black clothes, but……his face looked as though saying「So what?」. Surely, even though the iron bars thrown at him looked similar to shuriken that he previously saw at museum, or even though the pupil who climbed down from the main building’s rooftop was using a special descending tool where the tip of the rope had something shaped like a rake to be fixed onto the roof’s edge, or that one of them wasn’t making any footsteps while running, surely, everything was just Hajime’s misunderstanding.



Even if right now, in front of Hajime’s eyes a pupil was quickly running with a forward-bent posture――the so-called ninja run right past him, surely that was just his misunderstanding!



「Hajime, welcome!」



But, at that moment, a slightly lively voice called out to Hajime who was seeing off the back of the figures of the people of the Yaegashi dojo with a complicated expression. When he turned toward the voice, he could see the figure of Shizuku dressed in a gorgeous kimono waving her hand at him from the porch of the main building.



Hajime lifted his hand with a greeting of「Yo」while approaching her. Shizuku’s expression burst brighter the closer he got. Looking from up close, it seemed that she was wearing a cosmetic even if just for a bit. It appeared that she was dressing up a little with Hajime coming here from being invited.



Shizuku, who was lovable as usual in the small things, quickly cleared up his gloomy feeling that had been piling up due to this and that since he stepped past the gate of the Yaegashi house, which he couldn’t retort at even when he wanted to.



「As expected, Shizuku is more suited to Japanese clothes. Though it doesn’t look like a pure yukata……」



「Ye, yes. I received this as a sample of a prototype that Tio designed. It seems that this is a combination of the Dragonoid race’s clothing with Japanese clothes.」



「I see, she is a pervert, but she has good sense. It’s like it was order-made for Shizuku. Besides, the sakura color also suit you.」



「-……thank you」



Shizuku looked shy while she quietly touched her lips. She couldn’t hide her happiness from Hajime noticing and praising her. The person who was there wasn’t the usual gallant knightly Shizuku, but a normal girl in love that could be found anywhere.



Instantly, Hajime put his hand into his breast pocket and summoned a mini Donner that had a silencer attached. Without even showing a drawing motion, he rapid-fired to the right side with the gun barrel hidden under his arm! Right away, countless sparks and metallic sounds scattered in midair!



Shizuku came to her senses with a ‘hah’. When she turned her gaze there she found a bulge on the ground so small that no one would notice it was there without paying attention to it; from there several small things that looked like bamboo pipes peeked out……



It seemed, there were still several pupils hiding underground. Most likely there was a tunnel that could be entered by a person under the surface, by slightly lifting up the lid that was camouflaged as the ground, they sniped at Hajime using blowpipes.



「He, hey-, you all! You all are doing something like that again! Come out here!」



Shizuku raised an angry yell with a bright red face. But, they didn’t respond to Shizuku’s words, the ground was making slightly lumpy moves, and they vanished away somewhere.



Shizuku was trembling all over. Hajime was sending her a slightly sympathizing gaze while trying to ask her about the matter that bothered him as expected.



「Hey, Shizuku. Your family, just as I thought, they are the descendants of ninjas or something, right? It’s true, isn’t it?」



「……There is no way that’s true, I think. Before we were summoned, there was nothing like this. It’s only been like this since Hajime came to my house. Even I didn’t know that kind of technique existed in the Yaegashi-style. In reality, I was only taught the katana, martial art, and throwing art.」



「I don’t think that’s at the level of “only” though……. Or, how should I put it, you didn’t ask them? Like, 『Did I receive kunoichi training while I do not realize it myself?』」



「I questioned them already. I asked, what is the Yaegashi-style? Like that.」



「And the answer?」



「It’s commonplace kenjutsu and a little bit of acrobatics. That was what they told me.」



「So they concealed it from even their daughter ……」



Shizuku was whispering「This family of mine……」with a faraway look, to which Hajime was sending her an increasingly sympathetic gaze while to the Yaegashi family’s mystery――not only were they not hiding it at all even though they were obviously ninja-like, even their deception was so noncommittal it made him want to retort ‘do you all even have the motivation to hide it huh’――he was smiling dryly.



After that, Shizuku, who knew about her grandfather and father’s assaults, apologized to Hajime with teary eyes while heading to her room for the time being. However, even during their walk there, spears stabbed at them from the gap between walls, a pitfall suddenly appeared on the corridor floor, the wall in the middle abruptly turned, and an expressionless Koichi came at Hajime with a kodachi swinging, and when they thought they heard someone say「Muh, my hand slipped」, from the corner of the corridor a chain scythe flew making a pillar as its fulcrum which altered its trajectory using the centrifugal force toward Hajime……



「Shizuku……just accept it. Your house is a ninja’s residence. Your family are ninjas.」



「I, who didn’t know until this year that my own house had these kind of contraptions, am…….I mean, Ojii-chan! A chain scythe is no good! Look, it got stuck into the wall! That’s obviously the real thing, isn’t it!? Just where are you keeping that kind of weapon!」



Shizuku angrily went to the corner of the corridor while waving her yukata’s cuff, but there was already no one there. Shizuku crumbled down on all fours. This was the first time she saw the other side of her family since she returned from another world. It appeared Shizuku was burdened with the fate to go through hardships even inside her family.



「Hey, Shizuku. As expected should we go to the living room instead of your room? Shuuzou-san also told me that. Like this, I don’t know what kind of contraption will activate the moment I entered your room. It won’t be a problem for me, but your treasured collection(plush dolls) might be in danger you know.」



「……Uu. There is nothing like these odd contraptions in my room, supposedly. There is undoubtedly something in the living room……or rather, I’m already terribly angry by the fact that Hajime was attacked! I’ll have Hajime together with me in my room until the meal timeee! If anyone becomes a nuisance, I aa~bsolutely won’t forgive them you hear!」



Surely, Shizuku was raising her voice loudly toward her family who must be lurking behind the ceiling and on the other side of the wall.



They finally arrived at Shizuku’s room. Inside, there were many plush dolls placed around that it made the room cramped. There was a lovely animal and cat calendar, pink curtains, a cushion attached with fluffy rabbit ears, the whole room was enveloped in a soft atmosphere with a faintly sweet fragrance wafting off. It was a really sly girly room.



Shizuku put the sitting cushion of a droopy raccoon in front of a small round table made of glass. When Hajime sat on the cushion, it made a「pukyu」sound. The figure of the demon king of another world sitting down on a mascot cushion that made that type of voice, if it was seen by the classmates and the fellows of the other world (especially someone like the emperor) surely it would be a foregone conclusion for them to burst out in laughter.



「Wait there. I’ll prepare tea and snacks right now.」



「No, you don’t really need to do that. Rather, I don’t want to be left alone in this house……」



「Uu. I, it will be fine. Because my room is a safe zone.」



Even while faltering in her words, Shizuku guaranteed that ‘my room is safe!’, immediately following that, however,



「Hajime-san, welcome. This is a sweet bean jelly from a long-standing shop. Please have some.」



Shizuku’s mother――Kirino appeared carrying tea and snacks.



――From the ceiling *sucha-!* she jumped down.



「Okaa-san!? Where did you come down from just now!? Wait, the ceiling board is out of place!? No way……even though I should have properly investigated my room when I knew that the house was a residence with contraptions……」



Kirino was smiling friendly as though nothing happened with a sidelong glance at Shizuku who was dumbfounded while looking up at the ceiling. That figure which was gentle and calm exactly like a Yamato Nadeshiko, yet with an atmosphere where a straight core could be felt from her caused Hajime to comprehend something ‘I see’; that she was indeed the mother of Shizuku. She was a woman that made him think or even made him anticipate that when Shizuku aged beautifully, surely she would become a woman like this.



However, the fact that she jumped down from the ceiling while properly wearing kimono, with a tray in one hand that had tea and snacks on it, with not only her clothes unruffled but not even a drop of tea was spilled, she wasn’t someone normal at all.



「He, hey, Okaa-san. Let me ask this, putting aside the matter regarding my room’s ceiling for later; it’s just as I thought, that Okaa-san is a kunoichi? Hey, is that true?」



Since she returned home up till today, different from her father and grandfather, her mother didn’t show that kind of sign at all. Shizuku was asking her mother with a really complicated feeling that was half「Say that this is not true, mama」, and half「Okaa-san, so you too」.



Toward such Shizuku, Kirino was,



「My, Shizuku. You are too much in high spirits just because Hajime-san is here……. Forgive her okay, Hajime-san. Geez, this child, surely she is trying her best to make a joke that is in line with Hajime-san’s hobby but……by nature, she is a serious person, so like this, her joke is not really funny, isn’t it? A joke like『You are a kunoichi?』toward her mother of all things, see? She is a child like this, but please don’t desert her no matter what.」



「……Please rest assured. I don’t think that it’s not funny, or anything, even for a little bit. Rather, I’m greatly in sympathy with her. ――Are you okay, Shizuku?」



「I cannot do this anymore, Hajime. I want to become the child of Hajime’s family already……」



Hajime did his best to console Shizuku who was hanging her head down with an expression that was like a tired old man with a ‘there-there’ gesture. Seeing that harmonious(?) figure of her daughter and Hajime, Kirino said「My, geez Shizuku, acting like that in front of your parent. Yes yes, Okaa-san will leave right away」and left the room.



Of course, *hyupa-!* she jumped up to the ceiling.



Seeing the ceiling board that was returned back to normal soundlessly, Shizuku then looked at Hajime with an expression that could break into tears at any moment.



「We, well, what……like this Shizuku is also taught the secret of your family little by little yes? I don’t know if that’s because you returned from another world, or because you were able to make a lover like me but……good for you.」



「In this world, I wonder if there is a matter that is better off not to be known……. I feel like the thing they are doing is gradually escalating……」



Shizuku was comforted while being caressed by Hajime.



Hajime thought while looking at Shizuku who was like that. It was normally hard to imagine that she wouldn’t know about her family and the house’s contraptions until she entered high school. But, there was no way that Shizuku was lying, in that case, that meant that Shuuzou and the others were seriously hiding it from Shizuku.



Furthermore, before the summoning, in other words, even when she became a high school student this matter hadn’t been told to her. That could possibly mean that Shizuku wouldn’t be told any of this for her whole life; such a possibility couldn’t be discarded.



Then, why did a matter about one’s own family be hidden from their only daughter or granddaughter?



At the great labyrinth of another world, Shizuku’s true feelings were exposed. After that, Hajime became aware of the things that Shizuku was harboring from the story that he heard from Shizuku herself. About how happy her stern grandfather was when Shizuku displayed the talent for kenjutsu. About how much the people around her were putting their expectations on her.



And also about how as a result, just how much of Shizuku’s true feelings were suppressed because of those.



Hajime recalled the words that were said to him the first time Hajime first faced Shuuzou and Koichi.



――I see, so Shizuku, is fine already.



――My thanks, for letting Shizuku be a girl.



It seemed that rather than the return from another world, the two of them were feeling gratitude from the bottom of their heart at the fact that Shizuku fell in love with her own true feelings, at that growth of her. Relief also exuded out from them.



Hajime didn’t ask much at that time, but he was able to guess.



By some chance, Shuuzou and the others might be regretting that they made Shizuku studying the Yaegashi-style. It was impossible to tell a grandfather not to be happy when his granddaughter had a lot of talent for the family style, and that a parent having expectations for their children was also something natural.



That was why they got too passionate against their better judgment, and like that when they noticed, Shizuku already couldn’t even make a complaint to her family, creating a Shizuku who killed so many parts of herself.



Seeing such a Shizuku, surely Shuuzou and the others didn’t teach her anything more than kenjutsu so that she wouldn’t kill a part of herself any more than that. They thoroughly concealed the family secret.



This was just his guess, but Hajime was convinced that it was the truth.



Hajime spoke with a gentle tone while caressing Shizuku’s head.



「Perhaps they are a troubling family, but……you are treasured by them, right?」



「……I don’t deny that.」



It appeared that Shizuku also guessed that somehow. Though she couldn’t help but unintentionally look sour because it was hidden from her, and how extremely troubling the absurdity of that secret was.



「Now then, putting aside for the time being how one of my wives became a kunoichi」



「I didn’t become a kunoichi, don’t put that aside.」



Shizuku’s look grew increasingly sour with Hajime’s words, but when she noticed the presence of many people that were spreading out little by little in the surroundings, her cheeks cramped.



「Well, there is also Shizuku getting taught about your family I think, but……more than half of this is a test for me I guess. This must be something like revenge for a harem man who dared put his hand on their important daughter. Even Kirino-san was merciless, even though her face was smiling like that.」



「Okaa-san? As far as I know, Okaa-san didn’t do anything to Hajime though……」



「No, she is taking action even now you know. ……This tea and sweet bean jelly, something was put inside. Poison doesn’t work on me, but from the sensation, it’s something like a paralyzing drug I guess. Perhaps they intend to attack while I cannot move.」



「OKAAA-SAAA――――――N!!! WHAT ARE YOU GIVING TO YOUR DAUGHTER’S LOVER!!! STOP SCREWING AROUND; I’LL CUT DOWN ALL OF YOU TOGETHEEEERR-」



Inside the Yaegashi residence during midday, the angry yell of an infuriated Shizuku reverberated. She jumped out of the room with a black katana in one hand.



Hajime, who was left alone in the room, properly tasted the last piece of the sweet bean jelly before he whispered.



「Well, compared to the father of Kaori’s place, this brute force approach saved me the trouble.」



From the garden, sounds of「Ojii-chan and Otou-chan, and Okaa-saaan-, kneel seiza over there!」, the sound of something being blown away, or「Ojou, she is going mad! Send reinforcements!」, or「Muu, Shizuku, your skill’s improved!」, or「Don’t think that the current Shizuku can be stopped normally! Form formation! Prepare the Four Cardinal Thousand Execution formation-」, or「We are going to separate Ojou from that brat for sure! White Tiger squad, kill that guy now!」; sounds with that kind of impression could be heard coming from here and there.



Hajime was feeling the multiple presences who were approaching him while spitting out words「Whether, at earth or another world, there is really not much change huh……」really emptily.



After that, whether Shizuku finally knew all the secrets of her family, and then whether Hajime was recognized by Shizuku’s family or not……



For now, let’s just say that the pupils of the Yaegashi-style (hidden school) got along really well with the rabbit ears of another world.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I seriously don’t have time to write.



Even so, when I wrote following my whim, the Yaegashi-style became like this……





Chapter 196




Bu, but, well, I think that it’s fine if there is at least one of this kind of troublesome person isn’t iiit.



Sporadically growing weeds, old stone walls, and a blue sky that looked discolored were spread out. Things other than those which entered the field of vision were only the laundry stand, a rusty drum can with uncertain usefulness, and also the granny bike with a punctured tire leaned listlessly on the stone wall.



(Nothing has changed other than Okaa-san’s bicycle huuh~)



On the porch, with the cry of cicadas and the refreshing sound of the wind chime as BGM, the one who was kicking her legs back and forth while staring into nothing in a daze ‘bohee~’ was the eldest daughter of this household――Hatayama Aiko.



That day, Aiko, who had managed to return from another world, received interrogations not just from police and mass media, but also by school officials and government officials that spanned many days. After all, she was the only adult among the group disappearance. Even if the students were talking about fantastical stories they had experienced, the ratio of sympathy toward them was high, but for Aiko who was a working adult, she was seen with a sterner gaze by the society.



Having said that, all of them had talked about it beforehand and the conclusion that they reached was to talk about the events in the other world Tortus as it was without changing anything; also, Aiko herself didn’t have the confidence that she could fabricate “a really convincing story” that could convince the surrounding. So in the end, she could only give an explanation with content that was the same as what the students were talking about, which made her feel really ashamed as a working adult.



Naturally, in regard to her inability to bring back some of her students and how the students became obsessed with “wild delusions”, even though in reality those weren’t Aiko’s responsibility at all, but a flow which was pressing the responsibility to Aiko was starting to appear.



That flow was powerful. Furthermore, even idiotic opinions which said that perhaps the disappearance itself was actually the full responsibility of Aiko was also beginning to appear.



It was an incident with too many mysteries. The culprit was unknown. Some students didn’t return. The returnee’s wild delusions. Because all these affairs wouldn’t settle down without someone taking responsibility, a scapegoat so to speak, it was Aiko who was chosen to hold that role.



Aiko, who was completely exhausted with various things every day, was carried away by the flow of the surrounding, and she tried to respond to the demand of the surrounding and wore the stigma as the person responsible for the group disappearance incident. She accepted the severe bashing and the end of her job as a teacher――no, the end of her social life. Seeing this, the parents of Aiko, who couldn’t bear to witness the figure of their daughter that was reported every day in the news, also came to persuade her to return home. That was also one of the primary factors that affected Aiko.



But, just when Aiko resolved to distance herself from her students’ side, suddenly the topic was going toward its end surprisingly and unnaturally; however, bizarrely no one thought that nothing was strange with this development.



The culprit of that was of course Hajime.



Using the internet and media, he manufactured a super large scale awareness manipulation artifact, and he forcefully and powerfully, without letting anyone complain, interfered with the consciousness of the people all over the world.



Aiko, who knew that, made a grandly convulsing expression and leaked out「What have you done……」. After all, what Hajime did was brainwashing on a world scale. An evil deed that would make even an evil organization of a story go ghastly pale.



But Hajime shrugged toward Aiko who was haggard in various senses.



「The world who put false accusations on you and made their own interpretation as they pleased is the bad one. Returning tit for tat at them is only the matter of course, isn’t it?」



In other words, the flow of society, who had laid their hands on Aiko, was Hajime’s enemy. He didn’t kill them, so at least they could obediently get brainwashed, was his reasoning. They tormented his relatives with their curiosity, irresponsible remarks, and so on, so it was a punishment they deserved.



As for Aiko, she couldn’t say anything anymore having those things said to her. It’s unforgivable for you to leave my side because of the irresponsible flow of society. The person she fell in love with said that to her. Because of that, he made the consciousness of the world into his own.



A demon king-sama to the extreme was here.



No matter what she said, it wouldn’t stop Hajime anymore.



Aiko’s shoulders dropped limply, even so, inside her heart she felt flattered, she felt light as though she was floating, yet inside her chest, she also felt so tiiiiight that she writhed.



And so, in the end, Aiko managed to get reinstated in the school where Hajime and the others were attending. Furthermore, there was also the administration’s plan that wanted the returnees to be lumped together, which even caused her to be employed as the homeroom teacher of the special class of Hajime and the others, the returnees. Thinking of how before the summoning she was just a teacher without a class in charge with, in a sense, she could have said to have risen up in life.



Now then, through this Aiko safely managed to get reinstated as a teacher without getting separated from her students who were more important than anything since they had entrusted their lives to each other in another world, but here, a dilemma arose.



That dilemma was,



――I am a teacher. Hajime-kun is a student……It’s too late already but-



Yes, now she clearly remembered the relationship between her and Hajime. Of course, after the legendary decisive battle, she had already spent many passionate nights together with Hajime, so that thinking was reaa~lly something too late already.



Still, however, now that they were here on earth and in Japan, when she actually returned to her teaching job and stood on the teaching podium, from there she saw the figure of the student Hajime in his seat……



――Me, what have you doneeeeeeee-. You laid your hand on a studenttttttt-



Like that, she rolled around on the floor when she was alone. Her personality that was too serious by nature, and her extraordinary sincerity toward the teaching profession, when she had returned to the normal everyday life and calmed down, those two aspects mercilessly pierced Aiko’s mind all over *gussa gussa* with spikes and gouged it *chiku chiku* with marking pens.



Naturally, she was starting to avoid Hajime, however, looking at him flirting with Yue and the others exacerbated her heartrending, but as expected her guilty feeling, and whatever else, became an obstacle that made her avoid Hajime completely……like that, a really troublesome person had arrived here.



These past few months, far from spending time with Hajime, she didn’t even properly talk with him. Hajime being Hajime, he was running around fighting the government officials of the world, manufacturing artifacts to make it easier to open the gate to the other world Tortus, opening a business in order to provide for Yue and the others with his own hands, and so on. Spending busy days like that, he didn’t even go to meet Aiko.



――Lonely



That was the true feeling of Aiko without any falsehood in it.



――But, a teacher and a student, it’s just……as expected……



That too was the true feeling of a troublesome person.



――As expected, Hajime-kun and I are……uu, there is also the difference in age……there is also my social standing……



That was the true feeling of a very troublesome person.



While worrying endlessly like that, ‘There are thoroughly charming girls already around Hajime, perhaps a middle-aged woman like me should withdraw away……’ she was getting closer to such a conclusion while using the summer holiday to return home, and she became a no-good human like this on the porch.



「Hey, Aiko. You are making a very stupid face there. Isn’t your soul leaking out from your mouth?」



「Even if it leaks out, it can be returned back to its place you know, Okaa-san.」



Indeed, something like that wasn’t any problem if the age of god magic was used, though it was a different story whether her mother could comprehend that or not.



While making an exasperated expression at her daughter’s dazed reply, Aiko’s mother――Akiko asked「You want some watermelon?」. Aiko rolled over lazily and without stopping she kept rolling to the table. It was a wordless answer of「I want」.



Aiko waited for a bit while bathing in the wind of the electric fan. Akiko arrived carrying a watermelon that had been cut into beautiful triangle shapes. It was cold, juicy, and looking delicious just from a glance. Aiko was messing with the watermelon seeds with the provided toothpick before she bit into the edge.



The gentle sweetness spreading inside her mouth slackened the expression of Aiko loosely. Her appearance was completely an elementary student……an extreme of being child faced. She really couldn’t be seen as an adult woman at the age of 26. Her awakening to magic power also, for some reason, put her skin condition in an extremely excellent condition, surely that was also a factor that showed a childish look in Aiko.



「……When you are like this, I cannot see at all that child whose face was shown a lot on TV who was involving herself with various tragic resolutions. 」



「Mass media is scary. Government officials are scary. Board of Education is scary……fighting god’s apostle was still better.」



「Indeed, perhaps rather than magic, the flow of the society that cannot be seen by eyes is more frightening isn’t it. But, isn’t that fine. You have the strongest prince, don’t you?」



「……Not prince Okaa-san. He is the devil. Rather, he is the demon king-sama.」



「Anything is fine, but stop delaying already, let Okaa-san meet with my daughter’s benefactor soon. Otou-san, and Ojii-chan, and the others too, they are totally curious, you know?」



「U, uu~m……well, I’ll think about it.」



Aiko’s halfhearted attitude caused Akiko to sigh exaggeratedly.



The composition of Aiko’s family was her two parents and the grandparents from the mother side. Her family was fruit farmers, with her father marrying into the family. Even now, that father was telling his daughter who came home for the summer holiday ‘if you are free then help out here~’, going out to work hard in the farm energetically.



Currently, or rather recently, such Hatayama family had a matter that they were really concerned about.



That was regarding Aiko’s “lover”.



That day, the day their daughter who disappeared together with students unexpectedly came home, naturally the members of Hatayama family who received the explanation of the situation didn’t believe Aiko at first, but when Aiko’s magic extremely improved the farmland of the Hatayama family, and their crops also became the highest class product, they believed in Aiko while saying ‘well whatever!’ to the trivial matter.



In the middle of their talk, although Aiko didn’t make any declaration, they understood that somehow their daughter seemed to have made a lover. That she was able to return back to Japan was also thanks to that “he”, and the unthinkable pacification of the kangaroo court which tried to denounce Aiko previously was also “his” doing.



If this person was their daughter’s benefactor and the person who her heart had decided on, then they wished to be introduced to him by all means, but, for some reason, Aiko was evasively avoiding that and didn’t listen to them.



They were suspicious that this person could possibly be a horrible person, but seeing the figure of their disappointing daughter who grinned from seeing the ring that was always dangling on her neck, smiling cheerfully when she looked at her smartphone, talking to someone on the phone with her feet kicking back and forth and her face love-struck, holding her red face between her hands while shaking her head when she suddenly recalled something while doing nothing, they could understand that she was thinking of the other party from the bottom of her heart.



The family of Aiko was worried in their own way about the future of their daughter whose growth stopped completely when she was in middle school for some reason and had no romantic story at all. Because of that, they were, even more, looking forward to being introduced to the person who was chosen by their daughter.



But, as expected, no matter how long, Aiko kept acting elusive……



「Good grief, if you are like this, then “he” will get away from you eventually, you know?」



「Uguh!?」



Hearing the terrifying warning that was given by her mother regarding her relationship with him that she was currently worrying about, caused Aiko to spontaneously press her hand on her chest while a moan slipped out from her mouth.



「Even though you finally came home, you are just in a daze the whole day without even helping around the home. After all, you are worrying endlessly about “him” and ran away using going home as an excuse, right? Ah, or else, perhaps “he” actually already got away from you and you returned here because of heartbreak……」



「What are you saying, Okaa-san? That, I, don’t really have a, lo, lover or anything……」



Aiko averted her gaze, her volume turned smaller, and she toyed with the watermelon seed in high speed.



For Aiko, she understood her family’s wishes for her to introduce “him” ――Hajime. But, as expected, their relationship of teacher and student made it difficult to speak about even toward her family. No, it was extremely difficult exactly because they were family……



Inside her heart she was whispering「He is not my lover, I’m already treated as his wife, so I’m not lying……」which sounded like an excuse, making her have a vivid resemblance with someone somewhere.



「……Well, that’s fine. I guess you also have various things on your mind, and you are not a kid anymore. But, just remember that no matter what kind of person “he” is, we will welcome him warmly any time.」



「……yes.」



In the end, Akiko backed down, and the hand of Aiko that was playing with the seed slackened a bit. Akiko was smiling wryly at her daughter who was oozing out a relieved air while changing the topic.



「Speaking of, there is a festival this year too. It’s good timing, how about you try to change into yukata? You haven’t gone there anymore for these last few years, right? You loved Yamashiro-ojiisan’s cotton candy, didn’t you?」



「Yeah, now that Okaa-san mentions it, it’s this time……wait, Yamashiro-ojiichan, he is still alive……」



「You are really rude.」



「Because, when I was in high school if I remember correctly, he was already past 90 years old, right?」



「Yes, this year he will be 102 years old you know.」



「At, at that age, he is still opening a festival stand? Is he okay? He won’t ascend to heaven while making cotton candy?」



「You are really rude. Even now he is still lively. Even the person himself said that he would live for thirty more years.」



「He is planning to challenge even the Guinness record?」



Despite the silly talk, in the end, Aiko decided to participate in the nostalgic local festival, also for relaxing the gloominess inside her chest.



In the evening, when the beautiful sunset was about to disappear behind the mountains on the other side of the river, Aiko was at the front door with her body wrapped in a pink yukata. In her hand was a small and cute pouch, with her feet wearing refreshing Japanese sandals. When she was wearing a yukata, to some extent, a unique charm could be felt from her usual childish figure; perhaps that was because she was a Japanese.



「You are really going alone?」



Akiko asked while tilting her head.



「Yep. I’ll just aimlessly wander there. Otou-san and the others are also helping there, so I’ll show my face at their place for a bit.」



「I see……even if this place is in the sticks that doesn’t mean that there aren’t idiots, so be careful. Especially because on the day of the festival there are also people who cut loose too much.」



「I understand. Rather, after everything that happens, the likes of hoodlums really won’t matter much.」



「Don’t be conceited. If you like, should I call Taichi-kun to go with you?」



「Geez-, I’m really fine. Besides, Taichi-kun will be angry if he is called for something like this, you know?」



The one called Furukawa Taichi was a young man who, as it were, was Aiko’s childhood friend. In the past, the houses of the Furukawa family and the Hatayama family were close to each other. Since their farms were next to each other, the two families were closely associated. Taichi and Aiko also went to the same school all the time from kindergarten up to high school, so he was her trusted friend.



There was also a time when they temporarily distanced themselves from each other because of this and that at the puberty period. When they grew into adults they also never became a couple, but their relationship after that was friendly enough that met when they both came back here in an extended vacation where they would have a chat.



Taichi graduated from a university in another prefecture, and he immediately got a job at a company. But his father was hospitalized for a time, and he resigned from his job where he then succeeded his family’s farm about a year and a half ago. And so, in the festival this time around he was recruited as one of the young peoples’ group to help around……



「Is that so? I think that if it’s Taichi-kun, he will rush here happily though. Well, asking him to do that is too harsh perhaps.」



「That’s right. Taichi-kun is good-natured, but, as expected, he will get angry if he is taken advantage of too much.」



「That’s not what I mean though……well, that’s not where a parent should stick her nose into.」



「??」



Aiko tilted her head at her mother’s suggestive words, but Akiko didn’t look like she planned to talk more than that, so Aiko turned around and departed toward the festival.



She walked calmly on the familiar country road. Compared to the city, this place was accompanied with colors like the stars of the night sky, which were exceptionally visible, illuminating the path at night, the frogs staying on the fields, and the chorus of the cicadas burning their life on the trees.



(Although, as expected, the clearness of the air cannot compare with Tortus……)



What was revolving in the back of her mind while she was muttering to herself was her days in another world. Even amidst those memories, the one that she recalled vividly due to how dramatic it was, was……that reunion, that undesired result, and then the kiss that saved her life.



(Uu……)



There was also when she was imprisoned by god’s apostle Nointo. For her to be captured at the top of a tall tower, it was as though she was a princess in a tale. And then, he came for her who was in depression from anxiety and impatience, and that battle at the altitude of 8 kilometers.



She exposed her unsightly appearance after the result that she caused, and not only was that shameful figure of her seen, she was even looked after by him.



(Hau……)



After that, the words that he conferred to her beside the cenotaph was something that Aiko surely wouldn’t forget for her whole life. If the rescue drama before that was a salvation for her physical body, then the event in front of the cenotaph that evening was unmistakably the salvation for her heart. Thinking back, she was captured by an ardor that she couldn’t deceive herself from anymore since that time.



(Au……)



And then, with the battle at the devil king’s castle, and going through the legendary decisive battle……the gifted object. As the result of her attack after she let loose all her restraints, he let out a smile that looked as though he gave up, or possibly it was a troubled smile; and then to prove that Aiko was his――that she belonged to the demon king, he gifted her with a ring.



Aiko crawled her fingers on the thing behind her yukata, at the ring that was connected with a chain dangling behind the chest part of the yukata.



And then what she remembered was, the this and that of the night, that she thought might be staying unrelated with herself for her whole life, with how herself was a shorty. Just by remembering it she was still getting bright red. That was, that was……done too much.



「Awawawa-」



On the night path, Aiko fidgeted around while getting red-faced by herself. Seen from the side, she looked just like a suspicious person.



Even though she was getting like this so much, with her head suddenly getting full with Hajime even without anything particular happening, but the person herself was still harboring conflict (lol) inside her heart, worrying whether it was okay to continue this relationship. That was why if the wives’ group heard this they would undoubtedly get exasperated.



In the other world, she was titled a goddess and splendidly incited the people, this female teacher, who stood up against even the kingdom and the pope of the biggest religion for the sake of her students, was, in fact, a troublesome person that was super awkward when it came to love.



「Ai? What are you doing?」



「Ohee!?」



Suddenly a voice called out to her which caused Aiko to hop up *pyon* for real. Complete with a strange voice. Her face turned bright red in a different meaning this time while she turned her gaze toward the direction of the voice. There, she found a tall and sturdy young man, wearing a T-shirt with short sleeves in which the sleeves were further rolled up to his shoulder.



「Ta, Taichi-kun……don’t shock me like that.」



「No, Ai who was making a hundred comical faces alone in the road at night was the one who shocked me there……」



This young man, who was scratching on his cheek while calling Aiko with the pet name “Ai”, was just as Aiko called him, the person named Furukawa Taichi.



「Forget that……rather than that, Taichi-kun yourself, what are you doing in this kind of place? Aren’t you helping with the festival?」



「Aa~, no, I was but……because Ai said that you were coming. See, stupid bunches are also coming out in this kind of day yeah.」



「By any chance, you are intentionally coming here to pick me up?」



「We, well yeah.」



「Is that so, fufu, thank you.」



Aiko felt somewhat warm with Taichi’s nonchalant “good person act” that she knew from the past, and she smiled while expressing her thanks. Seeing that, for some reason, the young man Taichi quickly turned aside his face while his hand covered his mouth. When Aiko got curious「Oh? What’s the matter?」and circled around to look at his face, Taichi turned around hastily, and he walked toward the festival while urging Aiko ahead.



「Co, come to think of it, yukata. You are wearing it, huh?」



It was a somewhat sudden change of topic, but Aiko responded to the talk without being particularly bothered by it.



「Yep. The atmosphere is important in this kind of event. This is also the festival after so long that I rarely attended.」



「I see, you are right. …………That, what to say, it suits you.」



「Is that so? Thank you.」



Aiko responded to Taichi’s praise frankly, a little bit too frankly, by saying a normal thanks. She wasn’t at the age where she would be greatly concerned with words like that. ……Although that also depended on who was the one saying it.



Taichi felt a bit down, even so, he continued making trifling talk with his trusted friend, including reminiscent talk. Those two finally entered the busy festival and crowd of people.



There, the neighborhood uncle and aunt that knew the two of them since they were young bantered with them. Aiko clearly declared that the two of them were not in that kind of relationship even while responding calmly. Seeing such an Aiko caused Taichi’s cheeks to cramp. Seeing that situation, his comrades from the young persons’ association sent him a gaze that was mixed with sympathy……



Old man Yamashiro displayed his artistic skill that was pointlessly polished by making a Michaelangelo statue using cotton candy. Then the two of them encountered a female classmate of Aiko, who also brought along a child. Seeing that caused Aiko to hold a really complicated feeling, and when that classmate told Aiko that if she also married then~ half teasingly. The matter of Hajime floated inside her head which caused Aiko to turn a bit red though, and she didn’t speak any denial, which in turn caused Taichi to get pointlessly fired up……



And, with various things like that Aiko enjoyed a lot the festival that she hadn’t attended for a while.



With the festival, which was still lively, in the background, Aiko sat down on the porch of the shrine ground to rest while she was at it. Beside her there was Taichi who even though he was supposed to be a member of young persons’ association, he had been following Aiko all the time while she was walking around the festival; even now, he showed no sign of going to help at the festival.



In the silent atmosphere, Aiko was dangling her legs back and forth while listening to the bustling of the festival and looking up to the night sky. It was in the height of summer, but the shrine ground had a nice open space for wind, in which the night breeze felt pleasant on her skin which was damp from sweat.



Taichi was looking at Aiko, who had narrowed her eyes due to feeling good from the wind, with a dazed gaze……a beat later, he returned to his senses suddenly, and he slapped his own cheek. *pan-* That nice dry sound made Aiko startled, and she turned her gaze there.



Taichi opened his mouth, looking somewhat nervous toward such Aiko.



「Hey, Ai. Recently, are you okay? See, just a bit before there were various things that happened, right?」



「Yep, I’m fine. It’s over already. Right now, I’m a teacher normally.」



「I see. But, the class that Ai is in charge of, it’s that class, isn’t it? Then, won’t there still be a time when Ai would have to take the full brunt of the trouble?」



「……What do you want to say?」



Taichi’s gaze wandered from the dubious Aiko; however, right after that, he looked at Aiko with firm eyes and spoke.



「Isn’t it, enough already? You have, already, worked hard enough for your students’ sake, don’t you think so?」



「……」



「That’s why, just like Obaa-san and the others were saying before……come back home here already.」



「……」



Aiko didn’t answer, as though she didn’t want to respond to that topic, and then she stood up and started to walk toward the festival. Toward such Aiko, Taichi added on to his words looking impatient.



「It’s not like, you need to be at that place if you want to be a teacher, right? You can also try to find a job here.」



「That’s not why. I also have a responsibility, and above all, I myself, want to be at the side of those children.」



「Then, when those children graduate, what then?」



「That’s……but, even though that kind of incident happened, the school still trusted me enough to take charge of the class. I’m indebted to them.」



「That’s only because they want to gather the returnees in one place, right? Rather, if the current children graduate, you won’t know whether you can continue to stay there, don’t you? If it’s Ai, your face is widely known here, it’s convenient if you live here, and you also have connections to a certain degree that can help you.」



「Perhaps that is so but……that’s, still in the future.」



Aiko’s complicated attitude finally made Taichi irritated, and he stood up vigorously.



「……What Ai is concerned about, is actually not something like your duty to the school, or your responsibility to your students, am I right?」



「Eh?」



「What Ai is concerned about……is actually the matter of your lover, isn’t it?」



「Wai-, what are you saying……I, something like a lover is……」



「The one who thinks that it’s a secret is just Ai. Obaa-san and the others, me, we all know. That in the middle of your disappearance Ai made a lover. And also, how that lover is……your student.」



「!!!!?」



Aiko went「How do you!?」, an action that was really easy to understand. Seeing that act of Aiko’s, which was too honest in a sense, Taichi continued his words while his expression turned complicated.



「There is no way we wouldn’t know. Since the past, Ai is just too poor at hiding a secret. It immediately comes out in your behavior. Besides, even after you returned back you frequently contacted someone, you made a lover while you disappeared, yet it wasn’t a relationship that you could introduce to your parents, it must be a relationship that stimulates your guilt or morality by continuing it……When you searched for the answer that satisfies all those requirements, then it can be nothing but a student.」



「……Taichi-kun. Since when did you become a detective?」



Taichi said「I told you, it’s not just me, Obaa-san and the others also know that」toward Aiko who was stunned. When Aiko realized that the secret was actually exposed to her mother too, she was finally at her wits end with her hands holding her head.



Seeing such Aiko, Taichi resolved himself and spoke.



「A relationship between a student and teacher……you understand, don’t you Ai?」



「tsu」



「Ai yourself, you are feeling tortured like that. I don’t know what happened in the middle of your disappearance, but surely that was just how much of an abnormal situation it was, right? Then, that was just your momentary loss of judgment. I don’t care about that.」



「Taichi-kun?」



Taichi approached Aiko, and he stared at her fixedly with a serious gaze. Aiko took a step back from being overwhelmed, but when Aiko drew away, then Taichi would also close the distance accordingly.



「Ai, let’s stop that kind of impure relationship already, and come back here and start from zero. At first, it might feel lonely, but……I will be at your side from here on.」



「Taichi-kun, what are you saying……」



「I told you that I returned here because of my father’s sickness, but actually that wasn’t it. My father’s sickness was healed in one week……the truth is, when Ai disappeared, I felt uneasy, I couldn’t even focus on my work, and so, I resigned from my work to search for you full time.」



「Was, was that why?」



Aiko’s eyes turned round from this truth she didn’t know. And then, now that Taichi had spoken that far, then even the dull Aiko could guess just with what kind of feeling Taichi had been speaking about until now. That fact made Aiko astonished precisely because she had never thought of that possibility for even a bit until now.



「When I heard that Ai was gone, I thought that my heart got crushed. At that time, I noticed it. For me, Ai is, an existence that is that important to me.」



「Ta, Taichi-kun, fo, for now, let’s calm down a bit?」



「I am calm. Ai, come home. And then, marry me. I will treasure you, so be together with me forever!」



「No no, wait a bit! That’s too sudden! I, am not thinking of Taichi-kun like――」



「You relationship with your lover, it’s not going well, right?」



「Uguh」



「There is no way it’s going well. The other party is just a student. There is no way he can make Ai happy. If it’s me, I have seceded my house and also have resourcefulness, even my age matches yours. It will absolutely go well between us.」



Aiko’s back was already glued closely to a pillar of the shrine ground. The approaching Taichi suddenly tightly grasped the shoulders of Aiko. Taichi’s eyes had a seriousness that Aiko had never seen in them until now; they were overflowing with sincerity, including passion, so hot it was scalding.



If Aiko didn’t have a lover, yes, if this was before she was summoned to the other world, depending on the situation, her heart might be stolen even if she thought nothing of him until now except as someone like a brother. That was just how much of a “man” her childhood friend, who she thought she knew, was to her. As for his speech, she couldn’t help but feel that it was somewhat hurting but……or rather, now that she thought calmly, it was a bit, but it felt like a somewhat dangerous pick-up line……



But, even now when that much feeling was expressed to her, what floated in the back of Aiko’s mind was, the matter of him……



「Hajime-kun……」



「Ai-」



The name that unintentionally leaked out in a small murmur caused Taichi to frown, but in the next moment, he tried to close his distance with Aiko in one go. Perhaps he intended to return his beloved woman to her sanity from the impure relationship she was imprisoned in, even if he had to take a little forceful method……or perhaps, it might be simple jealousy……



The shocking situations that happened in succession, and her mind that was split between her feelings toward him, caused Aiko to react late. She immediately tried to twist her body, but…..behind her was a pillar, both her shoulders were pinned down, it wasn’t that she couldn’t shake herself free but, it was unclear whether she would be able to avoid from injuring Taichi!



Therefore, even while she was putting on strength to the level that was a bit dangerous for normal people, spontaneously, inside her heart, she yelled asking for help.



(Hajime-kun!)



「What is it Aiko?」



「Eh?」



「Eh?」



Taichi and Aiko leaked out similar voices, and then before Taichi’s approach could reach Aiko, or rather before he could get blown away by Aiko, he stopped. No, he was stopped. His neck was grabbed tightly from behind.



*meri-* An unpleasant sound could be heard.



「-, who, who are you-. What are you doing-」



「Oi oi, that’s my line you know? Just what are you doing to my woman?」



Right after that, Taichi’s figure vanished. No, he was sent flying backward with a force to the degree that it looked like he vanished. It seemed that his neck didn’t bend a strange direction or anything due to the superb moderation of power. But, he was fiercely sent flying to the ground where he rolled many times, the impact made him cough fiercely.



With a sidelong glance at such Taichi, Aiko was flustered while she stared at the person before her eyes feeling dumbfounded.



「Ha, Hajime-kun?」



「Yeah, it’s me.」



「Wh, why, are you here?」



「Because, Aiko is here?」



「No, even if you are saying something like a mountain climber somewhere with a question mark like that……」



Hajime smiled wryly seeing Aiko at a loss.



「Recently, you looked like you were thinking too much about various things. We also didn’t really have time to talk, on top of that you came home here. I thought it would be troublesome if you were persuaded by your parents to make an annoying decision, and because of that so I planned to visit here. And, when I used the compass to move here, you were in the middle of some kind of festival, right? I thought that by some chance, you were going around the festival feeling lonely by yourself, so I flew here but……the result turned out all right in the end.」



Hajime’s eyes narrowed dangerously toward Taichi who was standing up and glaring at Hajime even while coughing. Seeing that, even while feeling happiness welling up inside from understanding that Hajime was worried for her and he rushed here to spend some festival time with her, she also felt intense shame and fretfulness because her figure that was approached by someone else just now was seen by Hajime.



「U, um, that’s not what you think! There is, nothing like that going on between Taichi-kun and me! I don’t, have any intention like that at all!」



「Aa~, yeah, I see……」



Taichi, who was walking toward them, went「Gahah」with his hand pressing on his chest. Seeing that figure caused Hajime to make an expression where he was unsure of what to say. The woman he liked denied him with all her strength――indeed, hearing that would make anyone press on their chest spontaneously.



「But, recently you were worried a lot about your relationship with me, right? Perhaps you were worrying endlessly when we became student and teacher once more……it’s already really too late to think like that.」



「Hau!?」



This time, Aiko was the one who pressed her chest. Her gesture really resembled her childhood friend. That fact made Hajime’s wry smile deepen while he suddenly circled behind Aiko and embraced her. 「Ha, Hajime-kun!?」or「You-」could be heard, but Hajime ignored it.



Hajime kept embracing Aiko while he talked with a voice that was oozing a bit of exasperation into her ear.



「Even this relationship that Aiko is worried about will resolve itself not even two years later. Even so, if you are bothered with that two years, then both of us just need to hold back until that time arrives, right? If Aiko wishes for it, then I won’t mind something that small.」



「A, u, that’s……bu, but, I, am far older than you……」



「……Aiko, I’m telling you this for your own good. Just absolutely don’t say those words in front of Yue. You don’t want to have air travel ten kilometers high with your flesh body, do you?」



「Aa……」



Thinking really really carefully, something like a difference of age……above the sky there was still sky. It was something that she must not speak of no matter what.



「Good grief. Humans are a living thing that will think of various stupid things the moment they calm down, and Aiko is the very model of that kind of human huh. On top of it already being too late for that, it’s a problem that can be resolved easily. For you to become irresolute due to that……if you are that much fixated on “being a teacher”, then you at least have to be like how you were once before, where you remonstrate even me.」



「Uu, I have nothing I can say……」



「Or rather……just who do you think I am, huh? When I accepted Aiko, I should have declared it already.」



Aiko recalled. One month after the legendary decisive battle, when she wished that she also wanted to be loved by Hajime. There, she was accepted, on top of what was presented――the term of demon king-sama.



――When I decide to accept you, there won’t be any getting away.



There was no concept of “parting” for the woman of the demon king. Even if Aiko herself hated it, Hajime wouldn’t let her get away, no matter what kind of situation there was. It was impossible for him to accept any woman other than his beloved while there was any possibility of parting. That was the minimum distinction of Hajime who was someone preposterous and the worst from keeping relationships with multiple women.



The only one he could accept was only a partner who could offer her whole life to him and vice versa.



Therefore, it was meaningless for Aiko to worry about ethics, common sense, or whatever because Aiko had already offered that body and heart of hers to the demon king.



And the consequence was, that she couldn’t get away from demon king-sama.



「You understand?」



「……yes.」



Just with a sentence, when Hajime questioned her, Aiko easily surrendered. She nodded up and down repeatedly with her face bright red.



There, Taichi directed a severe gaze at Hajime who was still embracing Aiko from behind and opened his mouth.



「……You. Get away from Ai. You are, if I’m right, you are Ai’s student, aren’t you? I guess you don’t understand because you are still a student, but your existence is hurting Ai. This world is not so sweet that you can make it somehow with just feeling――」



「Thanks for the warning. But, You have mistaken the process too much to put on air as an adult with good sense. Your persuasiveness is nonexistent at the point of time you are reaching out your hand toward someone else’s woman. If you weren’t Aiko’s childhood friend, then I’d do the Inugami family to you but……well, this time I’ll magnanimously overlook it. Give up on Aiko and search for another suitable wife.」(TN: About Inugami family. I tried to google it, but the only thing I can find is a mystery novel about serial killing.)



Having a man that was younger, furthermore, someone that was still a student, talking back to him so frankly caused Taichi’s mouth to open and close wordlessly. And then, with a complexion that was busily turning blue and red intermittently, he was about to yell angrily at Hajime,



「Yaahn」



「tsu!?」



Yet he turned speechless due to the coquettish voice that Aiko raised and the spectacle happening in front of his eyes. Of all things, Hajime was thrusting his hand behind the chest part of Aiko’s yukata before his hand started to grope around! What an act! It was truly like a demon!



Then Hajime casually took out a ring that had been turned into a necklace from Aiko’s chest. Aiko, who had something embarrassing done to her in front of her childhood friend that was already like family to her, glared at Hajime with teary eyes + upward glance, but Hajime warded off something like that like a willow swaying in the wind.



「Understand that we are already at a stage where words won’t do anything. Just as you see, rather than my lover, Aiko is already my wife. Her body, her heart, I have received them all.」



「Yo, you-」



Hajime’s speech was completely like the villain. No matter how anyone looked at this, this was a composition of a gentle and sincere young man having his childhood friend snatched away by a bad man. The speech that Aiko could say in this kind of time should be「Stop-, don’t fight each other because of meee!」as expected. Although, the moment Aiko said such a thing, she would surely receive Hajime’s iron claw of love.



Taichi was about to condemn Hajime along with his emotion that felt like erupting, but before that could happen Hajime threw his words at him with a cold expression.



「You reap what you sow.」



「What-」



「You should have a powerful weapon that I don’t have. You have time and the same living environment that you spent together with Aiko since childhood, and even after you two became adults you must have met her many times too since then, isn’t that right? You should have had so many chances to exchange your feelings with Aiko, but you passed up all those chances. Don’t make any excuses now. You couldn’t even become a “reason to go home” for Aiko to give no place in her heart to go toward me. You didn’t try. The result of that is this. That’s all there is to it.」



That was a sound argument. Snatched away――such a thing was a serious case of barking up the wrong tree. While Taichi was in a position that was closer to Aiko than anyone, he didn’t fight so that he could walk together with her. That was why, before he realized it, Aiko had been at a place so far that his hand couldn’t reach. That was all there was to it.



Talking like this was strangely remonstrating considering it was Hajime. He crushed his enemy mercilessly, and if it was someone who he couldn’t stomach, then he would ignore that person without speaking too much. When that person couldn’t be ignored, then, as expected, he would crush them. That was Hajime. It was unusual for him to speak like this to someone who had tried to place their hand on Aiko.



Looking carefully, even though Taichi got thrown away that showily just now, there was no wound on him which looked that serious.



(Because he is my childhood friend……)



That must be the reason.



Aiko changed her embarrassed expression and raised a tightly stiffened face. And then, she softly untangled from Hajime’s hand that was hugging her tightly. Hajime didn’t oppose her.



Aiko took a step forward and calmly opened her mouth.



「Taichi-kun, thank you for worrying about me a lot. Thank you, that you think of me so strongly.」



「Ai……」



「But, I cannot answer Taichi-kun’s feeling. I, cannot look at Taichi-kun like that.」



「……Because of that, you are with that guy――」



「Yes. Because the one I have feelings for is Hajime-kun. I was worried about a lot of things but……yes, it’s really too late already for that. I even think to myself just what in the world I am doing worrying like that.」



「……Society won’t tolerate it. That’s something that must not be done.」



「Yes, I know. But, I cannot help it. Because the person I fell in love with is hopelessly like a demon, let alone the society, even the world or the god are no match for him. I too am a wicked woman huh.」



「……Wicked woman. Those words don’t suit Ai the most.」



「But, I think that’s not bad.」



「Haa, is that so. So it’s just like that guy said, from the beginning, it’s “too late” already for me.」



Aiko smiled wryly as though to state her agreement.



Taichi glared fiercely at Hajime. Hajime accepted it with an unruffled face. Understanding that something like his glare wouldn’t shake this guy even a little, and then, having the painful sound argument thrown at him just now, on top of how his body was thrown before this, showed him that he couldn’t even possibly match this guy in physical strength. Strength abruptly left his shoulders after glaring at Hajime for a while.



And then, he wordlessly turned around and left the shrine ground.



「My bad. Perhaps your relationship with your childhood friend will be bad after this……」



「No, it’s fine. Perhaps, it will take a bit of time, but we will be able to return back to our brother-sister relationship again.」



「Then that’s fine……but, as expected, if he reaches his hand to Aiko one more time, then I won’t have the confidence to not do the Inugami family to him.」



「……Why, are you that obsessed with the Inugami family?」



Aiko smiled wryly at Hajime’s manner of speaking, then a beat later, she faced straight at Hajime once again. And then, she bowed her head.



「I’m sorry that I made you worry because of me worrying irresolutely about strange things. Thank you for coming to meet me today.」



「Yeah, I definitely had received both your gratitude and apology. But, don’t mind it too much. I said it before too, but I really like that part of Aiko.」



「Hee? Tha, that part?」



The unexpected word of “like” made Aiko become red once more. Toward such Aiko, Hajime said that before in front of the cenotaph of the Hairihi Kingdom, he thought that Aiko who was worrying there looked dazzling to him, and then he asked her whether she remembered what they talked about there. That was what Aiko remembered just not long ago. It was clearly etched in her memory; surely it was an important memory when her feeling toward Hajime became definite.



「You who was running forward swiftly with all your might, and then you who was holding your head when you failed or when you noticed your contradiction; but even so you endured it and found a conclusion in your own way which you tried to carry through. I found those parts of Aiko dazzling; those parts look really lovely to me. That’s why Aiko, you can stay just as you are.」



「……I think it’s foul play for you to say something like that.」



Aiko turned around with her back toward him, her face looking down so Hajime couldn’t see it. But even without seeing that face, it was easily imaginable that her face was becoming complicated with shame and delight.



Perhaps because he understood that Hajime made an expression that was delicately holding back his laugh. Really what a bad guy.



「Now then, let’s go to Aiko’s house. I have to give my greeting to your parents.」



「Eh?」



Those sudden words that were said aloud so suddenly with a light tone as though asking her to go to some convenience store for a bit caused Aiko to go ‘hah’ and she turned around toward Hajime.



「It looks like your worry is resolved already, so there is no more reason that you cannot introduce me, right? If I have to greet them sooner or later, then I’ll at least show my face to them while also sending you home. It is late already, so I’ll do the formal greeting once more tomorrow.」



「A, as always, what proactiveness……n, no, you know, the greeting can be done next time……I too need to prepare my heart……」



「Hmm, Aiko’s house is over there……oh? So your father and the others are going out to the festival. They are right nearby. Yosh, let’s spend some money while greeting them at the same time.」



「Ah, wait, don’t use something like the compass for this! Wait, please don’t ignore me and go off like that! Just what in the world are you planning to say to Otou-san and the others!?」



「Of course, I’ll say “Otou-san, I accept your daughter. I won’t accept any objection or refusal”. That’s the standard speech, right?」



「The standard where-!?」



「Or rather, Aiko. I’m bothered, just why are you speaking using polite language to me while you spoke casually to that bastard? Isn’t that cruel?」(TN: Aiko has been using polite language all this time with Hajime while using peer language when she talked to Taichi.)



「Eh? That’s, it’s about the atmosphere or something……wait, don’t change the subject! There is a lot of my acquaintances here from the paaast! If you are saying something like that to Otou-san in this kind of place……tomorrow all the neighbors will know it!」



「If you properly talk casually with me too then I’ll think about it. ……Well, the time extension won’t even be one minute for you to decide though. Oh, that’s your father, isn’t it? The first impression is important. First of all, let’s binge shop the stall’s goods.」



「Please wait! Wait, wait……I get it! I get it already! I’ll properly talk to you without polite language so don’t keep walking rapidlyyy!」(TN: Here finally Aiko didn’t use polite language.)



Aiko who was making racket ‘gyaa gyaa’, and Hajime was handling her unseriously while charging toward the direction of her family with a fearless smile on his face. Naturally, Aiko was clinging to Hajime’s arm while Hajime was advancing while carrying such Aiko in his arm, and coupled with their noisiness the degree of attention to them was at MAX!



The madams of the neighborhood, and the old people who were affectionate to Aiko, they all went「Oh my!」seeing the two’s situation.



And then, finally, the father of Aiko, who noticed Hajime walking toward him with his daughter in his arms, opened his eyes widely, expressing his shock, then he smiled wryly as though he had comprehended something.



After that, Hajime, who loudly proclaimed that he was Aiko’s boyfriend right in the middle of the festival that was overflowing with Aiko’s acquaintances, was awarded clapping and the cheering of hooray. Hajime kept restraining Aiko, who was trying to run away from shame, with a princess carry and was causing cheers to be raised.



Furthermore, it was supposed to be only Hajime showing his face, but with Aiko’s father and grandfather inviting him to come to their house no matter what, Hajime visited the Hatayama house and also met with Akiko and the grandmother. Then he talked to them about his wives other than Aiko and his intention.



With everything that happened at the Shirasaki family and the Yaegashi family, Hajime had resolved himself to be slapped with rejection and rage for sure, but unexpectedly both Aiko’s parents, and even her grandparents, all the people of the Hatayama family accepted Hajime. Of course, it wasn’t like they weren’t frowning, but with the feeling of wanting to respect the will of their daughter who was already an adult, and above all, their debt of gratitude to Hajime because he had saved their daughter from danger many times, it seemed that it led to their trust for Hajime.



In the end, due to the kindness of the Hatayama family, it became a course of event where Hajime stayed for the night, and by using gate the next day, the people of the Nagumo family also visited the Hatayama family, where the words of Yue and the others which said “together with Aiko” promoted the trust to grow even deeper.



After that, it was as though the Hatayama family and the Nagumo family became like a family group but……



As a result, Aiko’s hometown became well-known as the “Land of Miracle” where every kind of crop could bear fruit regardless of the soil quality or the season. Surely that was due to the mixing of the family of “Goddess of Harvest” and the family of “Demon King of Another World”……



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Actually, I also planned to write the reason why Aiko is fixated on being a teacher, but there wasn’t any time, and I couldn’t think of any idea. Despite so, when I began to write thinking [Anyway if I just write then perhaps I’ll think of something…], this kind of Aiko was created……



Well, continuing from before, Shirakome’s condition is a bit bad, so I’m thinking of getting a change of pace.



Even though I say that I’m writing a bit of a longer extra story.



I’m thinking ‘Should I promote him to a main character I wondeeer~’.



Remember, it’s him you know, him. Come on, his name is……eh?





Chapter 197




AN: This is extra story where that guy is the leading actor.



It’s totally undecided just how far this will be!



Anyway, the prologue



Caution



(Hakumei’s excuse=>When making earth in reality as the stage, various names and setting cannot be tampered around as I pleased. What if it’s actually different from the actual condition because of my lack in knowledge……then, it’s similar but actually it’s different from the actual earth! That’s why, things like organization name or country name or weapon name, it will be okay even if they are subtly different!)



It shouldn't be like this.



Everyone without exception surely must have said that in their life. Or even if not then surely they must have thought those words in their mind.



Looking at an ideal, setting a target, making a resolve, with seriousness, one pushed forwards toward the future that they wished to be.



But, what was called as life, and what was called as world, were extremely malicious. As though it was the norm, matter went left when one wanted right, and then it went right when one thought it would be left, and in the critical time it would went "right outside the expectation". That's impossible, absurd, it's unreasonable, etc., even if one was thinking those they would still be toyed around by the raging stream of absurdity as though they were swallowed and washed away by flash flood, and then thrown out into a beach(reality) somewhere like a driftwood.



People with their dream destroyed, their heart broken, just like a scrap wood, they would stood up and start walking once more, or else they would keep being buried under the sand(reality) and vanished……it depended on each person. Although, in most cases there would be salvation from somewhere else for them. Someone might come to clear away the sand, there was also a possibility of someone pulling at their hand to drag their buried body. Perhaps there would also be someone who would stay close at their side for them until their wound was healed.



But……



(Surely, there will be no salvation for me. It's beyond hope for me to meet something like that. Aa, I, just what have I done……)



It was inside an equipment storeroom that was overflowing with iron shelves and crammed with cardboard box and fixtures. The place wasn't that spacious, it was a place to temporarily deposit fixtures that were taken out from large storehouse for the time being, there a girl was sitting down while hugging her knees.



That girl's body twitched from the sudden large impact sound and she froze from fear. *gan-gan-gan* The impact sound reverberated consecutively. Someone was hitting at the storeroom door from outside. The girl lifted her face fearfully.



She was a cute――or more accurately, a beautiful girl. Her age looked around 16, 17 years old. She had blonde hair that was tied into a side tail using scrunchie. Her almond shaped eyes that resembled a mischievous cat was colored with jade pupils and long eyelashes. On the whole she had slender body type, her legs that were stretching out from her skirt were long and slender, wrapped in black stocking. She was a girl that could even pass as a model.



But, this girl was not a model by any means, and that was shown by her clothes that a normal girl wouldn't wear in the first place. Yes, the girl was putting on "lab coat" on her blouse.



She wasn't wearing a lab coat because she was forced to wear it due to some kind of event or because of some particular hobby, which could be obviously seen from the lab coat's worn out state and her appearance that looked familiar wearing the coat which for some reason could be thought as "fitting".



That girl dressed in a bit particular look screamed「hii-」when a strong impact sound *gan-* reverberated once more and she held her head with both her hands. She shrunk her body really small, from her look she was in a state of fear, however, it seemed that fear wasn't because the ringing impact sound outside the storeroom was unknown for her, rather she was scared because she knew the true form of that impact sound.



Because, while the girls expression was scared, at the same time colors of pity, sadness, and guilt were coloring her face.



「I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry……」



The girl in lab coat were repeating words of repentance with a voice so small as though it would melt into the air and became nothing. Just what was that apology referring to……



Butm at that time, the resounding impact sound stopped completely. The lab coat girl thought of a question「What is going on?」with tears gathering in the corner of her eyes. The behavioral principle of "them" that the lab coat girl created was extremely instinctual. Therefore they shouldn't be leaving away that easily from the storeroom where the "prey" that was the girl was inside. Then, perhaps something different that attracted the interest of "them" had appeared.



The girl wiped her eyes roughly with the sleeve of her lab coat and she advanced through the space between the shelves slowly and quietly on all fours. And then, the girl who finally arrived like a scared cat until beside a shelve at the inner part where it became a blind spot from the door of the storeroom, quietly peeked out her face from the cover of the shelve, her gaze moving toward the door that stopped making sound.



「Hiu」



She raised a strange scream that normally she wouldn't let out. The inside of her throat reflexively tightened from looking at the state of the door. Ahead of the girl's gaze, the door of the storeroom was――dented all over where it was in the verge of breaking down.



It was a storeroom to deposit items temporarily, so the door was made from iron and fitted with lock. Regardless large number of dent was created on the door as though it had received abnormal and concentrated impact which distorted it terribly. The outside corridor could be peeked out from the edge of the door. If the door received one more impact, then it would collapse inside the room.



「……」



Killing her breathing, the girl stared fixedly at the door for a while, before long strength suddenly left her shoulders. It seemed "they" had went away somewhere just before the door broke……



But, it seemed it was a bit too fast to think that.



*GOGAANNN* The door was blown away inside the room at the same time with that terrific impact sound.「Hih」The girl screamed and her body froze. The next moment, the door that flew inside with fierce momentum cut a swath through the shelves near the girl.



The girl fell on her butt and then perhaps because it was her habit when she was surprised, she hugged her head with both her hands once more, tears were gathering in the corner of her eyes while she fearfully opened her shut eyes.



「Fuuh――, fuuh――」



「a, ua」



Ahead of the girl's gaze was a man. It was a young man in the middle of his twenty wearing a lab coat similarly like the girl.



「Se, senpai……」



A whisper leaked out from the girl. The young man seemed to be a "senpai" that the girl knew. But, if a person that didn't know the situation was in this place, surely they would be unable to comprehend the girl's words at all.



Because, no matter how anyone saw it, for someone who was called as "senpai" by this girl whose intellectual eyes weren't clouded even with her scared expression, he didn't look like that type of person, no, in the first place he didn't even look like human.



The man's eyes didn't have fixed focus, those were abnormal eyes that sometimes fully bared the white of the eyes, his face and arms had blood vessels rising to the surface, despite how his body should have slim figure originally, his flesh was swelling bizarrely like bodybuilder, his breathing was rough and saliva was dripping down from his mouth, and he was raising low growl like a beast. There was no reasoning that could be seen from him. While he was wearing similar lab coat with the girl, but that appearance was truly out of place.



And then what was the most strange, was his fists that were tightly clenched. Those fists that likely were continuously hitting the iron door until it was broken just now, their skin was peeled, the flesh gouged, bones were jutting out, and they were soaked in blood, but those fists were rapidly returning back to normal in a speed that was obvious in a glance. No, perhaps to say more accurately, the flesh was swelling up, the bones that were cracked were connected back, and the fist was repaired to the shape of a fist that was still warped.



「uUUa-」



「A, a……」



The girl backed down while still on her butt slowly. The abnormal young man kept growling while heavily pursuing after her. The storeroom wasn't that big. Therefore, the back of the girl was immediately blocked by a wall.



The man was standing like a mindless beast in front of the cornered girl. Something warm was flowing out from between the legs of the girl who was holding her head. It was something that she did because of the extreme fear, but the girl herself had no composure to be care about that.



Toward such a girl, the fist of the young man that destroyed even a door made from iron was raised without even a shred of hesitation.



(I'm, sorry……. If only I didn't do that kind of research……. I'm sorry, senpai……everyone……)



While trembling toward her death that would surely arrive a few beats later, the girl repeated her repentance inside her heart.



Like that, the fist that could easily crush the face of the girl was swung do――



「Doctor Grant!」



An angry voice of a young woman and dry bursting sound reverberated. The fist of the "senpai" stopped. And then, slowly he turned around while growling. The lab coat girl also directed her gaze toward the door from the shadow of the "senpai".



There, was the figure of a tall woman wearing black suits with both her hands readying a handgun.



「Doctor Grant, please get down!」



「tsu」



Hearing the sharp instruction that shook the air like an electric shock, Doctor Grant――Emily Grant reflexively flopped her body low on the floor.



Right after that was the sound of gun discharging resounding consecutively. And then, a beast's roar. Footsteps that were like earthquake was going away from Emily. When Emily moved her gaze while lying low on the ground, she could see the figures of the black suits woman firing toward the "senpai" and "senpai" who charged ahead without caring of that.



At first it seemed the woman was aiming at the shoulders and legs of "senpai", but then she clicked her tongue looking that he didn't even seem to itch when the bullets hit. The next moment, with an astounding speed that it wouldn't be an exaggeration even if it was said that it was nearly instantly, the "senpai" closed the distance and he pushed out his fist toward the woman while screaming.



In no time, it seemed that the woman would become a mere lump of meat just like that, but at the next instant, it was proven that the woman wasn't an ordinary person.



「Haa-」



Along with a short breathing, the woman stepped forward. Like that, she weaved through the approaching fist and stepped inside the bosom of the "senpai" and grasped at his collar, and turned around. Without stopping she performed a splendid shoulder throw.



The "senpai" whose charging momentum was used for a throwing technique had his posture turned upside down and thrown onto the wall at the opposite side. Even so, as expected it was like he didn't feel any pain but……



「……Forgive me.」



That sentence was audible. At the same time, a dry bursting sound rang. The fired 9mm bullet penetrated from an eye of the "senpai" and mercilessly pulverized the brain. The body of the "senpai" twitched, and before long he stopped moving as though all strength had left him.



The woman held her handgun with both hands while observing the body with fixed stare for a while. Then with a sigh strength left her shoulders, it seemed she had judged that the "senpai" wouldn't move anymore. And then, she exchanged the gun's magazine with trained motion while taking a contact using her communication device to somewhere, with her quite expressionless face moving toward Emily that was sitting dumbfounded inside the storeroom.



「Doctor Grant, it's great that you are safe. I am Vanessa Paradis of state security. I come to pick you up. I will guard you until a safe place from here on.」



The woman who introduced herself as Vanessa quickly approached Emily's side and calmly held out her hand. The girl who saw from nearby comprehended it, indeed this woman had an appearance and air where it could be glimpsed that she was used to rough scene. Long slit and sharp eyes, with very short hair that was colored between grey and beige. Her height seemed to surpass 179 centimeter easily. Her whole body was emitting cold presence that was sharp like a knife.



Surely it was because of that, Emily wrinkled her eyebrows in vigilance.



「……I have grasped the gist of your circumstance. It's natural for you to be cautious. However, we don't have any leeway time wise. This facility is filled with the infected personnel. My colleagues are attracting their attention, but even so they cannot hold for long. That's why, please believe me for now and come with me.」



「…………senpai is……」



「……Forgive me. My priority protection target is you. I have no leeway to leave him as it was. Also, it was already too late when he became like that, that matter――」



「Yes. I am the one who know that the best.」



Emily stared for a while at the mere shadow of "senpai's" former self sinking in the sea of blood behind Vanessa, after that she moved her gaze to Vanessa. She was still having cold atmosphere and looked expressionless, but in her eyes that were so close Emily's figure was reflected on them, sympathy and apology toward could be seen somehow.



Emily stared fixedly at those eyes, then she took the hand of Vanessa that was still held out toward her.



「This doesn't mean I trust you but……I still, cannot die.」



「Yes, I don't mind that. Don't be separated from me no matter what, please follow me.」



Emily roughly wiped the tears gathering at the corner of her almond-shaped eyes that looked like cat with her lab coat, and then she sternly raised the corner of her eyes. Vanessa who saw that nodded briskly. And then she exited the room while leading Emily.



「……Senpai, I'm sorry. I swear, that I'll surely stop this.」



「……」



Emily left behind her words for the "senpai" at the end.



Emily who was still young and unfamiliar with the world even though she was called as genius was always alone in the university that she was enrolled into by skipping grade. Her personality that hated losing by nature caused her to use speech and conduct that seemed to say 'I'm totally okay!' even in such an environment, but as expected for Emily who was still very young it was something tough……



What let such Emily who was pretending to be tough to be a researcher in the true meaning, was the professor and the students of the laboratory where she was currently attached to. If the professor who she was indebted to for anything and everything was like her father, then the seniors were like her big brother and sister. They were affectionate to her like she was their little sister, and yet they treated her more than an equal as a researcher.



Even amidst those people, the completely changed "senpai" whose breathing stopped atrociously in front of her eyes was a benefactor who especially helped Emily warmly.



The silent prayer of Emily that went for less than a beat, was filled with really, really strong feeling that couldn't be expressed with words.



Even while staying vigil at the surrounding, Vanessa sent a glance without emotion at such Emily. No, there was a slight tremor in that gaze. It was something like a sympathy, or possibly worry……



However, the moment Emily finished her short silent prayer, Vanessa's gaze returned to its former expressionless look where her emotion couldn't be discerned.



「Let's go.」



「Yes.」



「Oo, so that's the famous clock tower. Yep, as expected something like this is best seen with your own eyes.」



There was a Japanese young man making click-clack sounds with his smartphone while making satisfied voice. Shouldering a largish rucksack, this young man wearing plain clothes with black tone didn't have any particular trait in his appearance.



That blackish young man took photo for a while, and then while confirming the result picture he lifted his face suddenly in realization.



「Crap, this is not the time to keep sightseeing. I've got to accomplish the instruction from my demon king-sama.」



The clock taken inside the photo was already showing the closing of the day. The surrounding scenery was already becoming quite dark with the cloudy weather although it wasn't as far as snowing.



The young man put away his smartphone and shouldered back his rucksack before he turned around while breathing out 'haa' white breath.



「Even though this doubled with my private business, but this is still a rough way of using someone. Well, I too am his relative more or less……there is no way I can refuse. Let's do my best.」



The young man vanished between the people hurrying to return home while talking to himself like that. Before long, his figure was completely buried into the surrounding scenery and he couldn't be seen anymore.



Although, before that young man slipped into the crowd, there was not even a person who sent their gaze toward him. He was too much normal, and too much without presence.



Someone who was able to notice that abnormality, was of course didn't exist there.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



This might make me sound obstinate, but one more time,



This is different from real earth! That’s why, if you want to retort ‘What the hell is state security bureau, somehow various things are seriously wrong here!’, I beg you to do it only inside your heart.



……Really, sorry.



Ah, also, I uploaded my activity report. I also placed cover image and special illustration there.



If you don’t mind please look over there too.



The next update will be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 198




London outskirts that was wrapped in thin mist. In a corner of a retro street where it felt like old fairy-tale or folklore might be hiding, there was a splendid residence where history could be felt from it conspicuously.



It appeared to be prudently maintained that it didn't look worn out. The garden that was spreading out at the front, the small path made from spread out white gravel and the flower bed where seasonal flowers were blooming, a small fountain where a beautiful goddess was sitting, all of those were first class work that gave elegant impression, from them it could be understood that really, really much labor, expense, and time were spent.



And that was how it should be, the master of this residence――Jefferson Allgrey was a famous wealthy person even at Britain. He was from a family lineage that was titled as the so-called "Real Estate King" that for generations possessed countless plot of land and building, buying and selling them.



Jefferson who was the current master of this generation Allgrey family also properly inherited the business talent from his ancestors, not only that he also seemed to possess political talent, he was a capable human that raised definite result while engaged in two trades of political world and real estate magnate at the same time.



The residence of such Jefferson was normally visited by many people. The type of people visiting was varied. If there were people from the same political world visiting, then there were also people from real estate companies who visited, there were also a lot of people visiting who were his personal friends.



Anyway, it was a house where the flow of people visiting it never ceased, and it was also a well-known fact for the people at the surrounding area.



Today too, a few hours already passed since the sun set, there was also the shrouding mist that it was a time where darkness had completely descended. The principal residence of Allgrey was lighted with brilliant illumination. Several high class cars were being parked nearby the main gate, showing how there were many guests visiting.



Although, each of the visitors today were definitely well-known characters, but it seemed they weren't friends that were invited for simple dinner, they also didn't appear to be guests who came for work-related matter to speak about politics or business.



「Now then, chief. Don't you think that we should get down to business soon? For you to assemble more than half of the society's upper echelons……it must be something really considerable isn't it? My guess that it must be a matter about them.」



A middle-aged man whose body was wrapped in a suit that was obviously high quality in a glance, with splendid moustache and belly meat, he addressed Jefferson as "chief".



Even though Jefferson was called with that designation that wasn't used that often in general, but he still behaved naturally. Looking from that attitude of him, it could be understood that it was only the matter of course for him to be called like that by the people who were called to this place today.



Jefferson slowly ran his gaze at the surrounding. It seemed that he had finished his meal, there was only wine put in front of him. Other than them, there were several servants of Allgrey family and the respective bodyguards that were brought by each guest.



Tonight there were nine guests gathered. Everyone of them were prominent figure that owned phenomenal result in their respective field, but the fields they participated in were completely scattered. Seen from the side this was a gathering that really couldn't be understood, the biggest possibility was that these people were the personal friend of Jefferson. Even if there was an outsider who knew of this meeting, then surely they would only be able to think of this as a meeting of fellow friends all the same.



But, from how Jefferson was sitting at the seat of honor while the others were sitting around a long table, it seemed that there was a clear pecking order here. And that became even clearer from the atmosphere they were clad in.



「……They are the real thing.」



A short sentence. For people who didn't know the circumstance, they would tilt their head wondering what he was speaking about. But, all the people at the dining table were instantly going astir from that sentence that was said by Jefferson with oppressive tone.



「Is that……is that, really true?」



「Wasn't that just a mere group kidnapping……」



「Certainly it was a inexplicable case, but……」



「A case of that degree is not that rare. Chief, do you have any basis saying that?」



While their mouths were speaking words where confusion and expectation were mixing together, their gazes were concentrating at Jefferson.



「There is still only circumstantial evidence. But, I have no doubt of it. ……I have confirmed that all the people who were sent to investigate were returning to their daily life without getting any information. Far from investigating, they forget even the society.」



「No way……」



「However, just with that……. It's not as though method to induce such situation doesn't exist you know?」



「Yeah, I know. Of course, I didn't make my conclusion just with that. ……This is the situation that can be currently confirmed. I judged that it is already at the level where there would be no problem calling it as supernatural.」



Saying that, Jefferson urged a servant with his gaze to distribute written report, the upper echelons sent their eyes to it. After they did that, they went astir once more.



The content that was written in that written report was,



It wrote, the house of the target group that had been confirmed once for some reason couldn't be approached for the second time. Even when they walked following map, when they noticed they were walking in circle at a completely different place.



It wrote, the observer was observing from a distance of 800 meter, regardless of that their gaze would meet without fail.



It wrote, the family register of the target that shouldn't exist until a few days ago was registered before they knew it.



It wrote, that abnormality wasn't noticed by anyone in the administration side. They didn't even feel that anything was out of place.



It wrote, everyday, their partners were disappearing one by one.



And then,



――It wrote, the people who were tasked to investigate, without exception all of them would have blank in their memory after a while. Even the matter that was being reporter right now, whether it was really true or not……was unknown.



Surely everyone was scanning the report until the very last sentence. Silence descended on the dining table. Everyone was fixated on the content of the report.



But, after a while……



「Fu, fuha, fuhahahahahaha-」



One person raised a laughing voice looking like he couldn't hold it down. It was a hideously distorted laughing voice that was composed from joy and madness. However, such laughing voice that would grant discomfort to anyone hearing it whether one wanted it or not, was gradually spreading to the other upper echelons too.



「Finally, we found the real thing! Magnificent! I wonder just what kind of supernatural they are knowing!」



「At the very least, it seemed they have the skill to interfere with human's brain. That's something beyond the position of mere students.」



「It cannot stay like this. Chief! We have to immediately send assault force and secure one or two sample!」



Excitement was ruling over the place. It was a mad excitement, just like how someone who lost in a desert finally found an oasis, that feeling of insane arousal before their craving could be fulfilled.



Perhaps this was only natural for them. Because these people had been secretly maneuvering, searching for "that" through so many years and months that they couldn't count anymore.



「Calm down……telling all of you that is impossible I guess. I understand well everyone's feeling. Then, everyone agree of the plan to move with the purpose of obtaining sample? There will be many troublesome things if we completely kidnapped all of them……」



「What, they are people who had gone through group disappearance once you know, chief. Even if it happened for the second time, surely there will be no one who thinks it strange. Not to mention there are also those among them who didn't return before this.」



「The ability possessed by the samples are concerning matter but……they are just children after all. It shows from how they are content with being student while possessing such power. We can do whatever we like if we involve their family into it. I will immediately begin to prepare the experiment site.」



「The returnee, they obtained supernatural while they disappeared……I'm bothered with the whereabouts of those that doesn't return. Perhaps, they are in the place that have to do with supernatural? If we grasped that, even us……」



The upper echelons let out their opinion after Jefferson's words. The meeting tonight was obviously filled with passion that was never seen before.



Like that, when they had decided the most of their plan from here on, Jefferson opened his mouth.



「Then, all of you, proceed with the matter paying meticulous attention for the sake of the accomplishment of our dearest wish. The priority target for securing sample will be the girl who is called as "Yue" as the first in the list――」



「About that, I think it's better if you stop with that though.」



And also the girls who aren't Japanese that are around the returnees――Jefferson was about to say that, but his words were suddenly cut off.



For a moment Jefferson thought that it was someone among the upper echelon who cut him off, but he immediately discard that idea as impossible. The returnees from the group disappearance in the middle of day that agitated the society――if it was asked what was the aspect that was clearly different in them compared to before, then the first thing that would attract the attention was the existence of the not Japanese girls who suddenly appeared.



Thinking from how their family register was created before anyone noticed too, then it would be valid to think of them as "visitor from the supernatural side". Then it was natural to prioritize securing them as sample.



That was the common understanding between Jefferson and other upper echelons that they obtained from continuously investigating the series of turmoil of the returnees that started from the group disappearance. For that reason, it was impossible for anyone to object here. And above all, the voice of young man which cut him off was a voice he wasn't familiar with!



Jefferson felt something cold running through his spine while raising an angry voice that questioned the identity of the person.



「Who! Where are you!?」



「No, I am right in front of you from some time ago. I was normally eating meal here.」



A voice that contained resignation resounded. At that moment, not only Jefferson, the upper echelons, the servants, and then the bodyguards too, they all finally aware.



「Yo」



With a really light mood, at the chair that was positioned at the opposite side of Jefferson, with his mouth stuffed with the same cooking that Jefferson and others were eating just now, was a Japanese young man greeting with his hand lightly raised!



「You bastard……where did you enter from? What is the guard at the entrance doing?」



The upper echelons and the servants were greatly shaken, the bodyguards were in the middle of taking out their handgun in order to recover from their disgrace, while Jefferson was restraining them from firing before he opened his mouth calmly. It seemed that he was also shaken, but the speed of him rallying back his mind ought to be said just as expected from an authority of politic-real estate world that managed this meeting.



Right after he took back his calm, dominating aura overflowed from Jefferson. That aura was something intense, if an ordinary person felt it then not only they would wither down without being able to say anything, they would undoubtedly trickle cold sweats while getting all flustered.



But, that young man warded off such dominating aura like a swaying willow……or rather, in the first place the young man didn't even pay attention to that aura, he kept eating the cooking of Allgrey residence with gusto while talking.



「Nguh. You asked me from where, I entered normally from the door you know. Mugu mugu, I even said excuse me. ……Though I was normally ignored.」



「……That, seems to be the cooking of my residence though?」



「It's awfully delicious. As expected from the place of a big shot politician and the real estate king. There was leftover in the kitchen, so I loaded it onto a plate by myself. ……I, I pretty much asked okay? I took silence to mean OK, but I properly asked okay? I'm not stealing you know?」



For some reason the young man kept reminding something like「It's true you know?」. Jefferson knitted his eyebrows at such young man. The more he looked, the more this young man looked like a normal youth. No, in a sense, he was too normal in presence and appearance that if he didn't concentrate it felt like he would naturally forget him, perhaps he should say that this young man wasn't normal in that sense……



「Who are you……or perhaps it's too unsophisticated for me to ask that? That remark of yours just now in this situation. And then that ability that managed to infiltrate here without anyone able to notice. You are……a returnee huh?」



Jefferson spoke his conjecture with conviction, but for some reason the young man who heard his words frowned and his face looked a little sad. While Jefferson was perplexed from that inexplicable reaction, the young man asked with a voice that also sounded sad.



「A returnee huh? you asked, if you investigated about us, then shouldn't you know about me too? I expected a reaction like『You bastard-, you are a returnee huh!?』, but……」



「What? A report of you is not……」



Jefferson was perplexed. He had looked over all the report of the returnee, he had driven into his head all the information of the returnees' profile from their family until their relative. If the young man before his eyes was a returnee that had been reported, then there was no way he couldn't recall him.



But, when one of his servants excitedly showed to him the returnees written report that had been converted into digital data in tablet……



「…………………Returnee list No. 28――Endo Kousuke? ………………ah」



「Yep, you forgot aren't you? Isn't that right? That's fine, I understand. Hehe, I'm used to it. Although my shadow is thin even in digital data, I'm not co, concerned at all you know? I am a riajuu you know? That's why, I'm really, really not concerned at all okay?」



Strange silence descended on that place. The young man――Kousuke who seemed to be thin in shadow even inside digital data was making *kacha kacha* sound with the spoon and fork, only that sound was resounding with clarity inside that room. Word of「Delish-」that he was whispering until just now was changing into「It's salty huh」.



「S, so this is the supernatural that you possess.」



「……I got this since birth. Even my mum, she often forget to do things like picking me up at kindergarten……」



「……I, I see. That, you know, must be hard for you huh.」



For some reason Kousuke received gentle words and sympathy from the man who was aiming at him and his friends. The salt content of the high class cooking was increasing! A female servant was wiping her eyes with a handkerchief. The eyes of the bodyguards who were readying their gun until just now were turning lukewarm!



While spouting complaint「If you sympathize than give me presence」inside his heart, Kousuke cleared his throat *cough*, he stopped eating and opened his mouth.



「So, about the reason I came here.」



「Mu, that's right. Certainly I've never thought that a returnee will directly march into here. It appeared that your side has also investigated us to a certain degree. ……You, don't tell me, you came alone here?」



「Well, yeah. Actually I was in the middle of personal travel though. But suddenly you guys are making conspiracy, so I was told to go here for a bit to crush all of you.」



Kousuke was looking at his smartphone while saying「In front of Rana, I cannot refuse that guy's request」with his shoulders dropping down. Seeing that Jefferson exchanged look with the upper echelons and the bodyguards while his expression turned ridiculing.



「Crushing us, is it. Looks like you are growing impudent after obtaining supernatural huh. It is overwhelmingly faster to shot your four limbs with lead bullet in this range. It seems that you have the technique to interfere with your opponent's awareness, but in this limited space, can you crush us faster than bullet?」



*gacha* Hard ominous sounds resounded countless time. The bodyguards were focusing their gun muzzle toward Kousuke. Their number was a little less than twenty people. The place was a large dining room where sixty people could enter with room to spare, but certainly in this limited space it was equivalent with not having any way to escape from twenty gun muzzles.



Jefferson who thought that this young man was showing composure because he was a child who was drunk in his own power reversely showed a composed attitude. He crossed his arms above the table, and then while hiding his mouth behind his joined hand, his sharp gaze was striking toward Kousuke.



「Young man. Won't you come to our side? According to the report, it seems that the livelihood of all of you doesn't change much before and after obtaining supernatural. It's worthy of praise that not one of you is running wild, but surely that's only because you all don't understand the way to use the power you obtained. Then, we will teach you what is the right way to use that power. This Jefferson Allgrey can promise you, a life that is filled with riches and fame that is beyond your imagination.」



「……You really can say that with straight face after calling human as sample huh. They said that the skin of a politician's face is thick but, that's really true. Scaryyy」



Kousuke didn't look like he was particularly moved by Jefferson's persuading words, rather he showed a creeped out look. While raising one of his eyebrows that money and fame didn't resound in Kousuke's heart, Jefferson continued his words.



「Then what about woman? You are ――」



「I have girlfriend, I'm fine in that. Rather, my girlfriend is a super beauty already. She is already the best-, yep.」



Having his words cut off and hearing Kousuke suddenly speaking fondly of his girlfriend in front of him caused Jefferson's gaze to become something severe.



「……It's natural for you to feel almighty if you have a special power. But, what is called reality is something that is more heartless then what all of you is thinking. Perhaps if it's just you, or possibly it's just all of you returnees then you all might make it work out somehow. But, what about the people around you? Your family, your friends who are not returnee, relatives. Can you protect all of them? Our society is not just about violence you know?」



Saying that, Jefferson looked at his surrounding. Ahead of his gaze were the upper echelons of their society ――every one of them were successful people who possessed social power. And then, the gaze of Jefferson spoke more eloquently than anything.



That this wasn't everything their society possessed.



In other words, even in the one in a million chance all the people here died, their society itself wouldn't be finished. There were still other people with power gathering in their society.



「I'll recognize your ability to gather information until this far and your guts to infiltrate into here alone. But, for you to be under the impression that the situation before your eyes is everything there is, you are still just a child. We have seek for supernatural from long ago, the society that have laid stretch our root to everywhere in the world, we are――」



「Hydra, right?」



Jefferson who implicitly pressed for obedience under the name of cooperation to Kousuke with condescending attitude was about to disclose the name of their society with plenty of emotion, but right before he could, Kousuke easily revealed that name.



Jefferson who twitched in reaction was about to open his mouth further, but ignoring him Kousuke ate the last of his food and operated his smartphone with one hand, then he spoke out the content that was displayed there.



「Abduction, murder, robbery, human experiment, on top of that even inducing war, a fanatic group of supernatural that will do anything――Hydra. Certainly it looks like you guys have long history. The origin of the name is because no matter how many upper echelons and parts of the organization are crushed, the survivor of the organization that is hiding somewhere will restore the organization back. The organization had existed since before the colonial period, historically the organization has been crushed several times, but before one knows it the organization is revived. The current chief is you……」



After that Kousuke read out loud the internal conditions of secret society Hydra. And then the information of upper echelon bunches who were here like their name, surface information, family, friends, work relatives, on top of that even the name of their illegitimate child or relationship with other organization that they kept secret even inside the organization. He didn't stop with just that, the concealed upper echelons who weren't here and the location of bases, and even further and further, things like the innermost thought of the upper echelons toward each other and so on, Kousuke disclosed everything.



It was clear that what was disclosed wasn't nonsense from the upper echelons who opened their mouth so wide it looked like their jaw might come off and their expression whose face turned completely pale.



Everything that they had done was impossible to be known by the information network of children or even by ordinary adult. Jefferson who had that fact thrust right back at his face not just by two fold but by ten thousand fold, the color of his face clearly shown how the capacity of his trained mind had completely went over capacity.



「When you peer into the abyss, the abyss will also peer back at you――su~ch famous expression, if it's you guys who loves supernatural then surely you have heard it before. We are standing in the superior position. Just how do you guys able to blindly believe such thing without any basis at all?」



「You, you bastard……」



「Well, you guys, you all are veteran through many adversity in the surface world huh. You guys must have never even dreamed that children who is going through school life without a care after getting their hand on magic will be able to overwhelm you even in information volume……」



「Why……just how, you know that much……」



「That's, if we know that there are some guys aiming for us, to say nothing of us, there is no way our demon king-sama will stay silent. Because that guy, he look like a cruel and heartless savage bastard, but actually he is totally spoiling the important people around him.」



「Demon king, you say?」



「Yeah. A godslaying demon king. That guy killed even god for the sake of a woman, and now you guys try to lay your hand on exactly that woman.」



Kousuke's gaze was growing to be filled with limitless sympathy. Jefferson's expression was grandly convulsing. There was already no dominating aura of a big-shot that could overpower ordinary person coming from him. Because he was a veteran manager and a politician who had piled up many experiences of going through adversity that he was able to understand Kousuke's experience and felt a sense of danger welling up inside him.



That was――they had touched something that should not be touched.



But, however, the people who were still relatively young among the upper echelons didn't have enough of that intuition.



「What is, what is, what demon king-. Just, what godslaying! Even nonsense has limit!」



「Tha, that's right! As expected you are just a kid. It seems that you don't even know how to bluff. Something like godslaying, as expected you have exaggerate too much.」



「Chief, no more word is necessary! Let's make this brat pay the compensation for looking down on the society! You guys, just keep him alive! Do it!」



Saying that, they started a reckless action without waiting for the order of the chief which was normally impossible. Jefferson immediately tried to raise his voice to stop them, but faster than he could, several of the black-suited bodyguards, because of the strange atmosphere and the mysterious uneasy feeling they had, as though aroused by their impulse they were aiming their gun toward Kousuke's limbs while jumping forward.



「……Haa. I had more or less tried it, even though I thought of doing this by getting spared from releasing the shackle.」



Inside the situation that was moving all at once, there was only that whisper resounding.



「Wha-. Where is-」



「Shit-, what is going on!? Where did that guy go!?」



「No way, he vanished!?」



The jumping forward black-suited bodyguards were surrounding a chair that had no one on it in feeling dumbfounded. The chair should have Kousuke sitting on it until just a moment ago. From the beginning until the end they didn't take off their gaze even for an instant from that chair.



He was certainly there. Right in front of their eyes. They would grip him up, pulled him down from the chair, and held him down. They reached out their hands without leaving any place to escape while even imaging how he would counterattack, they were certainly aware of him until the moment they could touch him. Yet despite so their hands moved through empty air and "when they noticed" the target had vanished. It was as though he wasn't there right from the start.



「-, our mind has been interfered already!? Be careful, our awareness is being manipulated!」



Jefferson, thinking that it couldn't be helped now it had come to this, he pushed at the emergency button at the other side of the table to summon the bodyguards standing by everywhere inside the residence while giving a warning. And then, he himself also took out a handgun from his breast pocket, at that time Kousuke's voice resounded once more. However, it was a voice with slightly different air than until just now.



「Interference to awareness? Fuh, what exaggeration……. My Ground Shrinker was beyond the pale of your perception ability, isn't that's all there is to it?」



「Wha-, impossible, standing on the ceiling!?」



Jefferson and others who were staying on guard against the most likely possibility of Kousuke sliding under the table was thinking in the corner of their mind 'doesn't it feel like his tone is a little strange?' while they looked up in surprise, and then they exposed a really stupid expression from shock.



Although, surely such reaction was something that couldn't be helped if they saw a human standing really naturally on the ceiling as though to say 'Gravity? What's that?'.



Furthermore,



(Why, why, is he making a strange pose!?)



Yes, Kousuke was standing upside down on the ceiling while covering his face with one hand with his eyes glaring down at Jefferson and others from between his fingers' gap! On top of that, before they knew it his body was already in an appearance of total black clothes, his eyes were wearing a sunglass on one-lens type, and his other hand was holding a black knife in a position that was crossed with the hand that was covering his face! Surely if the rabbit eared assassination group of another world saw this, they would undoubtedly clap and cheer while giving high praise of「What cool pose!!」!



「Fools who fell into the abyss of selfish desires and fanaticism. I'll teach into your body, that in this world, there are things that you ought not to know.」



For some reason, while rotating once before displaying a chuuni pose (version 24) again, Kousuke, no, the assassin of the strongest class who was awakened in various meaning at the other world, thrown a declaration of war toward the fanatic occult group. Together with that chuuni self-introduction!!



「The shadow of demon king, the vanguard of the dark rabbit ear family――Rapid Fang Shadow Claw, Kousuke E Abyssgate. Has arrived!!」



What does rabbit ear mean…….. Abyssgate, gate to where……. Those retort of Jefferson and others didn't form into loud words.



Because right after that, the peerless one even against the god's apostles in another world, the one with the thinnest shadow in the world, the best assassin in the world bared his fang.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Everyone’s review that is like it has been planned beforehand blew away Hakumei.



Like, Endo-kun, you are loved huuh. ……He is loved, right?



I properly got his name out this time, so please remember it properly.



He is Endo Abyssgate-kun, okay.



PS



I placed the information about the special SS for each bookstore-sama in my activity report.



Please confirm it if you please.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 199




「Haaaa~~~~~」



It was past noon where warm sunlight was showering down. In a corner of a certain city, at a lovely café with wooden entrance and terrace, a groan of a zombie was resounding. Although, people who got startled from that groan that sounded like it was reverberating from the realm of the dead was nonexistent.



Whether it was the couple that was feeding each other with cute cake at the terrace, or the male customer with businessman appearance operating his tablet alone, or the old man walking his dog who just passed through in front of the terrace, none of them showed any sign of being bothered by that groan. Or rather, they didn't even look like they noticed the groan.



「aaa~~~~~~」



The groan resounded once more. As expected no one noticed, but the owner of the groan who wasn't paid attention to, he also seemed to get used of not being paid attention to, so he groaned without any reservation regardless of him being in public space.



To say more while in this topic, that zombie imitation had his face pressed down on the café's table, with both his hands holding his head. He looked like, someone who had made a mistake that couldn't be taken back and lamented his very life.



Just to make sure, this wasn't a zombie that escaped a research place somewhere and slipped into the street, as made evident by the glass with the logo of the café filled with beverage put in front of him, and the sandwich that still wasn't touched but had already been properly ordered.



But, at that time, the smartphone that was placed on top of the table of the zombie imitation was starting to play the BGM of a certain epic RPG's demon king battle. That ringtone caused the zombie imitation to twitch in reaction, his hand crawled with his face still pressed on the table and picked up the smartphone.



And then, he put the phone on his ear and took the call still with his face pressed on the table.



「……bai」



『What's with that voice? That voice sounds like you are going to drop dead anytime.』



「Yeah, I feel dying. I caused my shame to overflow……」



『……I guessed it already. So you done it again huh, Endo.』



「I done it……I really done it, Nagumo. Perhaps, I'm no good already.」



『Endo……』



From the other side of the phone receiver, the conversation partner――the one who requested for the annihilation of the occult fanatic group Hydra, Nagumo Hajime guessed the mental damage of Kousuke and seemed to be exasperated, or perhaps it was sympathy in his voice that called Kousuke's name.



And then,



『Well, that doesn't matter――』



「It matter! Don't put it aside that simply! Give me more sympathy here! Have some more care! You are my kindred-spirit who know the same pain like me right!?」



Having his problem simply put aside like that, the excessive sadness caused Kousuke to succeed in coming back from zombie back to human. *Gabacho!* His face that was pressed on the table flew up and he raised the scream of his soul as though willing it to reach the other side of the sea.



『Even if you say that. In my case, I have a strong position as the victim of Hauria, but in your case, recently it came from yourself right? Not long ago you was still okay if it was just a little scuffle. Or else, was the case this time that difficult?』



「Uguu. Stabbing me right where it hurt……. That's, it wasn't really that bad yeah but……when I entered battle, unconsciously……. Maybe this is because before I asked you to open the gate and I spent a while with Hauria. Somehow, it feels like the more time I spend with them the more easily I "become" that……」



『Becoming Lord Abyssgate, huh.』



「Don't say that nameee!」



*gon-* Kousuke's face pressed down on the table once more along with that painful sounding sound.



――Endo Kousuke



The one with the scout role at the former hero party, at the legendary decisive battle which was carved at the history of the other world Tortus, he was the strongest assassin that boasted peerless performance against the apostles of god. ……Though such thing couldn't be imagined at all from the figure writhing in shame while groaning with his face pressed on a café's table.



The reason for such him who casually had a status of strongest to be turning into a hopeless person like this at a café in the middle of day, was needless to say because of the battle last night. Yes, that thing which was manifested at the battle, that chuuni conduct which was just too painful to look and listen to.



Just why he was performing that kind of chuuni in full drive even understanding that later on he would receive mental damage like this where it felt like he wanted to bash his head at the corner of a block of tofu and die? There were unavoidable reasons there.



One of the reasons was this.



===========================================================================================



Endo Kousuke 17 Years Old Male Level:92



Vocation: Assassin



Physical Strength: 800



Stamina: 940



Endurance: 450



Agility: 1700



Magic Power: 560



Magic Resistance: 560



Skill: Assassination Technique [+Dagger Art] [+Concealment] [+Tracking] [+Throwing Art] [+Hidden Weapon Art] [+Transmission Wave] [+Escape Art] [+Abyss Lord] - Presence Manipulation [+Presence Isolation] [+Phantom Step] [+Dream Illusion III] [+Clarity Phantom] [+Minimum Mind] - Shadow Dance [+Water Dance] [+Leave Dance] - Gravity Magic - Language Comprehension



===========================================================================================



As for the detail of those skills, [+Dagger Art] until [+Hidden Weapon Art] had the meaning exactly as the name implied, [+Transmission Wave] was an ability to strain one's ear to pick the vibration in the air or in the wall to listen at the conversation from some place in a distance, [+Escape Art] was a skill that gave aptitude correction to magic if it was used for escape.



[+Phantom Step] was a skill that left behind presence with afterimage piled up on oneself to blur one's own figure, [+Dream Illusion III] was a skill that produce illusion clone of oneself with the limit of three illusion, and then [+Clarity Phantom] was a skill that gave substance to the clone. [+Minimum Mind] was an invisibility assistance skill, when the user was being invisible, this skill would make the user's breathing, heartbeat, presence, and so on, and even the fluctuation of the mind to be in a flat state.



"Shadow Dance" was a skill to run on the wall that Kousuke often used. It couldn't let him stand still on wall, but as long as he had momentum he could continue to run of wall. Its derivation [+Water Dance] was the water version, [+Leaf Dance] was a skill that let him to use things like leaf dancing in the air as instant footstep for jumping.



Now then, have you all noticed? Nonchalantly there was a skill of a different disposition that could be seen just from its name mixing in among all those skills. Probably, that skill was exactly the one that awakened at that legendary decisive battle as the end derivation of assassination skill, the cause that made Kousuke's shame went into Mach speed.



――Abyss Lord (Abyssgate Lord)



The explanation from the status plate was like this.



Effect: In the middle of bloody battle, Abyssgate Lord arrived from dark bottom that is even darker than darkness. Now, o veil of darkness, o the dead of darkness, offer thy strength to the abyss! That is, the infinite power at dream……



The moment Kousuke saw this explanation, needless to say he threw his status plate on the ground with all his strength. It was also needless to say that he also grinded the plate with his foot while he was at it.



First the effect explanation was something cryptic that didn't become explanation, in the first place a nickname (?) that was given to him by chance at a battlefield becoming skill name just like that was also cryptic. Or rather the explanation text was just too painful. He didn't want to believe that this was really the final secret skill of his vocation.



However, just because of that didn't mean that he could neglect a power that he finally obtained without knowing its effect, and above all, there was a reason why Kousuke had to know it no matter what, and so he ascertained the effect while his SAN (TN: sanity) value was being shaved off grindingly. And the result that he understood, it appeared that this skill had the effect of a gradual Limit Break. It didn't raise his strength explosively like Limit Break, but a skill that strengthened all his specs little by little while that skill was in activation.



Furthermore, different from Limit Break, this skill didn't have the side effect of strong lethargy after use. It could really be said as an extraordinary ability.



Although, if it was asked whether it really had no demerit at all……the world wasn't that sweet.



The demerit of [+Abyss Lord]. That was……



While it was activated, the user's speech and conduct would be forcefully made to be a flawless chuuni(Abyssgate Lord)!



Furthermore what was troubling, the activation of the skill was basically possible to be done by the user's discretionary, but there was time when this skill activated before one knew it even when the user had no intention of activating it. Perhaps the cause of that was merely because of Kousuke's inexperience in handling this skill, or possibly there was other factor……



Just like Kousuke said himself, it seemed that the ratio of the forced activation was increasing in proportion with the time he spent with the members of Hauria clan, so most likely the cause was due to the latter……perhaps.



『I had recommended this to you before but, skill sealing artifact. Do you really not need it?』



「Uu. Tha, that's……I want it, but」



Hearing Hajime's words, Kousuke's expression turned bitter while his speech sounded hesitant.



Previously, when Hajime saw Kousuke who because of his speech and conduct that was too much looked like he was really going to sink into abyss, he said「I cannot watch this anymore……」and offered to Kousuke that he would manufacture a skill sealing artifact for him. Just seeing him made even Hajime felt like his chest was struck with pile bunker.



Kousuke's eyes turned bright right after he heard that offer, but his expression immediately changed as though he had recalled something, and then he refused the offer with an expression that was oozing out bitterness. The reason of that was,



「……Rana, she will be dejected then.」



『Really someone like you is……』



That.



Rana――Rapid Shadow, Ranainferna Hauria (Real name: Rana, just Rana. This is important so I'll say it for the third time, it's just Rana).



At the legendary decisive battle, Kousuke used his ability――including his skill and also his nonexistent presence that he had by nature――with all his power, and with all his seriousness to stay invisible, yet regardless of that this rabbit ear lady of Hauria clan found him normally. She was the woman who stole Kousuke's heart. And then, she was also the perpetrator who brought forth Abyssgate Lord to this world.



Above all else, Kousuke feared that if he sealed Abyssgate Lord, then she would fall out of love with him.



『Well, you went many hardships to go out with her . No, that's already crossed over the level of hardship. I think that you are the most amazing guy among our classmates you know, in various meanings. Or rather, I can even say that I'm holding respect for you.』



「I, is that so? It's not really something that much……」



『Don't be ridiculous. Just what is this guy who conquer【Raisen Great Labyrinth】by himself only for the sake of getting recognized by the woman he fell in love with is saying huh.』



「A, hahaha……yeah. I thought I was going to die that time. No, if I didn't use Abyssgate Lord state 24 hour that time, enduring that black history that made me dying in shame, I'd die normally there.」



Yes, just as shown by that skill which was casually written on the status plate, actually Kousuke had conquered【Raisen Great Labyrinth】. Furthermore he did it alone. At the battle against occult group Hydra, he was standing normally on ceiling wasn't because of his skill to wall run or because of Hajime's artifact, but by using his own gravity magic.



Even though the master of【Raisen Great Labyrinth】, Miledy Raisen was already gone, even though there was nothing but the half-automatic type interceptor golem that she left behind, but the labyrinth's trap and the situation where magic was unusable there were still going strong. Also, even though the golem was half-automatic type, they only lost the tactical capability like when Miledy controlled them, but their battle ability didn't decline even for a bit.



And Kousuke conquered such labyrinth by himself in a week and he returned alive. Because he was always in a state of Abyssgate Lord, his physical ability and will power, and then his chuuni speech and conduct, in various meanings they all broke the limit even more than Limit Break, and because he challenged his limit like that, his body and his heart, especially his heart! were all tattered, but even so he returned alive with all his limbs intact. It was only natural that Hajime and others were shocked by that.



『Really, you did well to survive. That was a savage condition that made even princess Kaguya look cute. You, just how much you loved that woman huh?』



「That's, so much that I'd challenge even Nagumo?」



『That's so huh……』



Yes, Kousuke was challenging the great labyrinth with even more preparedness for death than at the decisive battle when it was already completely the epilogue scene if it was a story where the final battle had ended, that was because the lovely rabbit ear onee-san Ranainfe……Rana gave a condition to Kousuke.



Since that day of the decisive battle, during the one month before they returned to earth, Kousuke was making his approach to Rana with great vigor.



However, Ranai……Rana was a Hauria clan, and all members of Hauria clan worshipped Hajime without a single exception. It was to the degree that if Hajime wished it, then any female of Hauria would instantly offer their body to him.



Of course, Hajime had the strongest hitting type bug character Shia Hauria who was the same Hauria clan like them, so there was no hero among them who would proactively try from themselves to obtain Hajime's affection. But, even so they made their "Boss" Hajime, the "demon king-sama that slaughter even god" as their standard for men so……to speak the unvarnished truth, their ideal was absurdly high.



And so, naturally, Kousuke's approach also didn't sway Rana.



「Fuh, I am a shadow that is serving "that person". A shadow doesn't need love……」



Like that,



「You too have strange taste aren't you. Know that you won't get away with just scald if you touch me, for you to pursue a dangerous woman like me……」



Or like that,



「Stop it already. A resolve to continue to walk together with me, in the bottom of darkness that is even deeper than abyss, there is none of that inside you am I right?」



Or like that, those sentences were told to Kousuke with fearless, or possibly bewitching smile on her face.



No matter how many times he confessed, Kousuke was shot down with speech that was undeniably excessive. Such Kousuke was seen by Hajime with a gaze as though he was witnessing a hero, while Shia was staring with intensely reproachful eyes (at Rana).



Even so Kousuke didn't get discouraged, he kept approaching her repeatedly, seeing that as expected even Rana seemed to be moved just a little by his persistence, that in the end it became like this.



「……Uu, do, do you want me that much? Not that, cough-. If you wish for this cursed body to that degree……. But, I belong to boss……not that, cough-. It's unfortunate, however my body already belong to "that person". That's why, okay? Give up……not that, cough-. Shadow live in shadow, and light in light, that is the law. Bu, but, well, if you conquer a great labyrinth or something like boss……or maybe, if you can make even a scratch on boss……it's not like I won't think about it, maybe? Not that-, cough-. Fuh, if you still wish for this body even then, then try to challenge the king of abyss and splendidly exert yourself and win.」



The beautiful rabbit ear onee-san said such thing while fidgeting and looking restless. It went without saying that seeing that caused the inside of Kousuke's chest to contain explosive heat that was equivalent with the eruption of【Guryuen Grand Volcano】before.



Yes, the condition that Rana gave him was to conquer a great labyrinth as well as landing an attack at the demon king Hajime…….



Just as Hajime said, it was a savage condition that might made even princess Kaguya to go「Wai-, you-」.



However, Kousuke who was blazing with the pathos of feverish love that could burn him to ash didn't even listen to the voices of the surrounding that tried to stop him, his figure vanished while no one noticed, he picked【Raisen Great Labyrinth】because it had the highest possibility for him to conquer and also because the age of god magic that he could obtain from there suited him the most, and then he jumped right into it.



After that, a week later. As expected Nagayama Juugo and Nomura Kentarou were anxious because Kousuke didn't go back. They discussed it with Hajime and others, the person concerned Rana was also acting 'perhaps I have said a little bit too much……' with her gaze swimming around, so Shia who was already familiar with conquering that dungeon was about to go out for searching (by no means that they finally noticed that Kousuke wasn't there only after a week passed), it was at that time,



Kousuke returned.



He was tattered all over, but he properly obtained age of god magic――the gravity magic. And then, while making the surrounding dumbfounded with his incomprehensible behavior of obtaining new power after the final battle for some reason, Kousuke made a declaration. He pointed his finger with a snap, and then boldly, with a fearless smile on his face,



「Demon king Nagumo Hajime-. Fight me!」



He said.



Naturally, Juugo yelled「Kousukeee, come back to your sanityyy! Stop doing something like suicideee!」, Kentarou begged「Shirasaki-san-, Ayakoo, anyone is fine! Quickly a recovery magic-. I beg you treat his head carefully!」, Aiko-sensei clung at Hajime while pleading「Hajime-kun, don't be hasty-. Endo-kun is, that, he is just a little tired! His head is-」, and then Kouki, Ryutaro, and Suzu stood in the way between Endo and Hajime, they were trying to buy time for Kousuke to escape while getting drenched in cold sweat with the preparedness of death.



All those caused Hajime to say「You guys, just what do you think I am……」with his cheeks cramping, but he was reaping what he sow, so no one consoled him.



In that place that was filled with chaos, Kousuke completely ignored his friends who were stopping him, his gaze turned toward Rana and then he proclaimed with a loud voice, willing it to reach into her heart.



「Rana-san-. I love you! The condition that you gave me――if you can put even a wound at boss, then it's not like I won't think about it, those words, I believe in them! In front of Rana-san's eyes, I'll put a wound at Nagumo, clearly and distinctly-!!!」



Hearing that proclamation, the classmates who didn't know that Rana's condition was just her hiding her embarrassment finally guessed the reason of Kousuke conquering a great labyrinth and his war declaration to Hajime which could only be thought as suicide wish, and they thought.



――So it's Hauria again-!!!!!



Everyone simultaneously directed criticizing gaze of「What the hell you have said to him!」to Rana. Rana who received those gazes were drenched in cold sweat while her gaze was swimming around as expected. Her cheeks reddened a bit from Kousuke's declaration while the Hauria females at the surrounding were giving her broad grin and teasing.



Now then, Hajime who received the challenge because of all those felt somewhat of a sympathy at the scenario of a boy challenging a powerful enemy for the sake of the woman he loved and he accepted that challenge.



Of course, he had no plan to get done in that easily. Even he had women that he loved, doing something like an unsightly fight in front of those women, was something that wouldn't do no matter what kind of circumstances it was, and above all, Kousuke himself would ask to be excused from "being gifted a mercy win".



And so, Hajime and Kousuke carried out a duel, and the result was――



The fact that currently Rana was accepting Kousuke's feeling was the clearest proof there was. The strongest assassin character, + full power Abyssgate Lord state, the combination of those weren't just for show.



It was a grand battle in various meanings but……that would be told in another chance.



Kousuke who accomplished the great feat of conquering【Raisen Great Labyrinth】solo, as well as dealing a blow at the godslaying demon king, he splendidly shot down Rana's heart with that challenge that put his life at stake.



But, naturally, although Rana had entrusted her to Kousuke, the fact that Rana was a Hauria didn't change, the time that he spent together with her, and also the time when he was welcomed by Kam and others as family, all of those times were basically spent as chuni. Naturally, because of that his Abyssgate Lord time was also increasing……



「Nagumoo, perhaps, I cannot go back anymore……. Perhaps, I should just go until the very end just like this instead.」



『You are really driven to the wall huuh. But, even if you stop being Abys――chuuni, I don't think that girl Rana will fall out of love from you though? The fact is that you broke through that girl's savage condition right from the front. That is something that nobody else will be able to do. No matter even if you are chuuni or not, but there is no way she will abandon you who have gone that far for her sake after this late.』



「Perhaps, that's so. But try to think from the opposite. From here on too I'll spend time together with Hauria clan as relative. If I act normally among them by myself……won't the away game feeling get bad like that? See, it will be like a guy that cannot read the mood who will make a realistic retort like『This kind of thing is impossible in real world』when you are playing fantasy game.」



『Wha, what a difficult guy……. Well, that's an example that is easy to understand though. Indeed, doing that will dampen the mood.』



「Right? This guy, he can't read the mood huh, or what a boring guy, or he is not fun huh……if Rana think of me like that, I don't have the confidence that I can keep living even then.」



『Don't assert so surely like that geez. Rather, you cannot be helped anymore, in the end Endo, you have already found the answer inside yourself right? That's why, I too just tried to casually put it aside……』



「Listen to me here! I too know that I'm just complaining! But I want someone to listen to me still! Recently when I talked this to Juugo or Kentarou, both of them would just act 'saying this again huh~' and won't listen to me at all! You are my kindred-spirit that know the same pain aren't you!?」



『Aa, got it, got it. That's why don't scream like that to the phone.』



In the end, it seemed that Kousuke had the resolve to shoulder by himself (?) his shame or his metal damage, the point was that he just wanted Hajime to listen to him grumbling. Because Hajime understood that, that at first he tried to put it aside, but it seemed that Kousuke wanted him to keep him company in him letting out his stress.



Hajime who was faithfully keeping company with such Kousuke was also completely different from the time when he was at Tortus, perhaps it should be said that he had mellowed. Though perhaps there was also the feeling of sympathy in him as a comrade who knew the same pain of heart just like Kousuke said.



After that, for a while Kousuke spoke his grumbling at length, between times he also asked for love consultation (?) like a way to progress his relationship with Rana, before finally Kousuke's mind was recovered, it was at that time that Hajime finally spoke the main topic of why he called――the detailed story of the occult group Hydra.



『So? I don't think that you will make any miss but, was the treatment to those guys went well?』



「Yeah, no problem with that. Hydra has become a charity group inside those guys. I think they will direct the funds of their society to unfortunate children from here on. I don't do anything to the bunches that weren't at that place though.」



『I don't mind that. After all they are a big organization. It seems that they have members everywhere, I'll deal with those. Well, perhaps I'll ask you to do something like this again if you happen to be nearby the target location while you are in your private business like this time.』



「No, I wasn't really close with this place. I was at North America you know? You, aren't your sense of distance getting weird because you can use gate?」



Kousuke glared with reproachful eyes while understanding that Hajime couldn't see him. Which wasn't surprising. In the first place Kousuke left Japan wasn't to purposefully respond to Hajime's request. If that was the case then no matter how extremely busy Hajime was, it would be faster if he opened a gate and directly marched into the enemy base.



This time Hajime requested Kousuke to deal with antagonistic organization was because the timing was just right when Kousuke was overseas in a private business using his winter vacation. And then, the private business of Kousuke was to boldly observe battlefield medical treatment in practice. Therefore, the destination of Kousuke was a country with inadequate medical system, there he learned directly in the spot, and by the time he thought 'well, perhaps I should go back soon?', an imperial command came down from the demon king-sama to him.



By the way, for the moment Kousuke was a student preparing for examinations to enter the medical university he wished for, but perhaps it was a present for doing his best at another world, his skill "Language Comprehension" also could be used for all languages on earth, he was already like a native speaker right from the start at the foreign language subject, the other students preparing for examination were in the state of teary eyes in that subject, so Kousuke had relatively more leeway there.



Also, Kousuke wanted to enter medical university not because he wanted doctor license or that he wanted to become an elite doctor, but only because he wanted knowledge and technique that could be put to use at Tortus someday, so there was no need for him to enter into a university with that high of a standard, like that sometimes he was going around like this relaxing while also observing real practice of medical treatment.



The base of occult group Hydra that was Allgrey residence was located at Britain, so thinking with common sense, it couldn't be said that it was a place that was close with the place that Kousuke visited this time. It wasn't like Kousuke had a gate so he normally made use of commercial airplane (he had quite a lot of request fee transferred to his account from Hajime though) to travel until here which made it even farther.



『I told you before that if it's you I'll at least make a degraded crystal key for you didn't I?』



「……I'll refrain from that. Nagumo's artifact is too convenient. If I grow to rely it like it's only natural, then it feels like I'll think of normal life as inconvenient, that's scary. If I'm traveling then I'll limit myself to my own feet and public transportation.」



『You, even though you have thin shadow but something you say something with depth huh.』



「You don't need to add about the thin shadow-. Just the request fee you transferred is enough. About this much is just right for a timid person like me.」



Kousuke could feel Hajime smiling wryly at the other side of the phone from his words. Kousuke who didn't receive really high assessment from the surrounding because of the thinness of his shadow fundamentally had low self-esteem. Even though he always produced an outrageous result "when he noticed", he wasn't evaluated by other, that was why it didn't become an awareness of him that what he had done was amazing.



『Well, anyway, you saved me the trouble there. I planned to crush them sooner or later, but recently I'm seriously busy. If those guys start to move all out it will be really troublesome, but now their heads are crushed before that happen, so I guess they won't move for a while. Now I can devote myself to what I want to do with this spare time.』



「That's great. If I remember right, you are doing various things like making it easier to open the gate to Tortus right? If that works then I'll be able to meet with Rana more casually.」



Leaving aside Kousuke's low self-esteem, their talk came to a finish after Hajime heard about what he wanted to ask. Kousuke earnestly reminded Hajime that he would cooperate with this kind of odd jobs, so he should hurry with establishing a way to make it easier to come and go to Tortus, after that he was about to hang up the phone.



「Then, later. Nagu――」



It was at that time.



Suddenly, *gyagyagyagya-!!* such sound of something slipping fiercely resounded.



「Wha, what is!?」



『Oi, Endo, what――』



The shocked Endo turned his gaze toward the street where the sound of slipping and scream of people were reverberating from, right after that a thunderous sound that drowned the words of Hajime came, a car was drifting through the street corner rushing out toward here.



The thunderous roar was the sound of that car running wild coming into contact with the car parked on the street. The parked car that was hit had its mirror blown away and its tail lamp popping off. However, while it clearly caused such incident, the car that made its entrance with a drift didn't show any sign of stopping at all, far from that it accelerated further.



Toward the café where Kousuke was.



「Wha-, wa-――!?」



The couple, businessman, and then the beautiful waitress who were also at the terrace screamed while tumbling over trying to escape inside the café. The next moment, the black car that looked tough pulled its emergency brake just before it charged into the terrace and its rear part mowed the terrace heartily.



Wreckage of terrace danced midair, and then tableware and cooking……



「Uoh. That's a waste!」



Kousuke was evading the wreckages of the terrace before jumping to the air and with *hyupapapa-* caught the sandwich that he still hadn't touched! In his hand was a plate that he secured unnoticed while the sandwich was put on it before it was blown away still beautifully untouched due to Kousuke's exquisite skill. While he was at it, he had put away his smartphone into his pocket unnoticed and in exchange used his hand to use the glass that he had secured to skillfully secure the blown away beverage to a certain degree.



And then, he caught midair the last piece of sandwich with his mouth and lightly landed on top of the café's signboard that was placed on the walkway.



「Mugumuguh, puhah. Good grief, a car suddenly came charging, just what in the world――」



Kousuke swallowed the sandwich that he caught in his mouth and he spoke his complain with his two hands holding plate and glass, there his gaze suddenly met someone.



The black car that was temporarily stopping after crashing into the terrace. From the window of that car's passenger seat, there was a blond haired girl with his mouth opened wide looking as though 'I had seen something unbelievable!', her gaze staring fixedly at Kyousuke.



Beside the girl who had pretty blonde hair that was tied into side tail and almond-shaped eyes with unyielding spirit that reminded one of cat, there was also a beauty with crisp appearance and very short hair style who was the perpetrator of this reckless driving. That very short hair lady was also staring fixedly at Kousuke.



「A, aa~, he, hello? Are you two, injured?」



Kousuke was making a bit awkward expression from the stares of the two that was too straightforward while he tried to say such thing for the moment. Perhaps reacting to that, the cat eye side-tail girl was opening her mouth to say something but,



「Eh, wai-, again!?」



A fierce slipping sound that suddenly could be heard made Kousuke's cheeks convulsed and he turned his gaze there. Ahead of his gaze, there were the scene of similar black cars, two, three of them drifting while rushing out from the street corner.



The woman with very short hair also seemed to notice that, she recovered her time that stopped from witnessing Kousuke's absurd movement. She immediately moved the steering wheel, stepped on the accelerator and rapidly took off right away. The cat eye side-tail girl passionately kissed「Mugyuu-!?」the side glass due to the centrifugal force.



The black car boarded by two females seemed to, no, they were really running away from the black cars that came from behind, their car was driving dangerously once more while vanishing at the other side of the road. After that, the three black cars passed through in pursuit.



It was a scene that happened out of nowhere. In a hair's breadth, the couple and businessman that had escaped from the terrace into the café fearfully peaked outside, while Kousuke was drinking up his beverage with *zugo-――* sound.



『Oo~i, Endo. What happened?』



Actually the call was still connected all this time, the voice of Hajime resounded from the smartphone.



Kousuke jumped down from the signboard and gently put down the glass that he had just drained on that signboard. His gaze was moving to the other side of the road where the cars were disappearing while he took out his smartphone, and then he responded to Hajime seriously.



「Nagumo, as expected, foreign country is scaryyy.」



『……You, what are you saying?』



Hajime's retort drifted lightly into the blowing wind and vanished completely.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Now then, about the custom (?) heroine attribute,



Blonde side-tail + Lab coat girl + unyielding cat-eyes + ○○ + ○○



Something will surely be entered into those ○○. Please use your imagination if you like.



By the way, the model for her is Akita Neru. Tda-style is goddess. (TN: Tda-style is character model that is used at Miku Miku Dance, Vocaloid)



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.




